[cover]


Rosa Luxemburg



THE MASS STRIKE, THE POLITICAL PARTY AND THE TRADE UNIONS


(1906)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written and first published: 1906.
Source: THE MASS STRIKE, THE POLITICAL PARTY AND THE TRADE UNIONS by
Rosa Luxemburg.
Publisher: Marxist Educational Society of Detroit, 1925.
Translated: Patrick Lavin.
Online Version: Rosa Luxemburg Internet Archive (marxists.org) 1999.
Transcription/Markup: A. Lehrer.
Ebook Conversion: Dave Allinson, 2015.

Available online at:
https://www.marxists.org/archive/luxemburg/1906/mass-strike/index.htm

------------------------------------------------------------------------


Contents

I. The Russian Revolution, Anarchism and the General Strike
II. The Mass Strike, A Historical and Not an Artificial Product
III. Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia
IV. The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle
V. Lessons of the Working-Class Movement in Russia Applicable to Germany
VI. Co-operation of Organised and Unorganised Workers Necessary for
Victory
VII. The Role of the Mass Strike in the Revolution
VIII. Need for United Action of Trade Unions and Social Democracy



I. THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION, ANARCHISM AND THE GENERAL STRIKE


 

Almost all works and pronouncements of international socialism on the
subject of the mass strike date from the time before the Russian
Revolution [of 1905], the first historical experience on a very large
scale with the means of struggle. It is therefore evident that they are,
for the most part, out-of-date. Their standpoint is essentially that of
Engels who in 1873 wrote as follows in his criticism of the
revolutionary blundering of the Bakuninists in Spain:

“The general strike, in the Bakuninists’ program, is the lever which
will be used for introducing the social revolution. One fine morning all
the workers in every industry in a country, or perhaps in every country,
will cease work, and thereby compel the ruling class either to submit in
about four weeks, or to launch an attack on the workers so that the
latter will have the right to defend themselves, and may use the
opportunity to overthrow the old society. The proposal is by no means
new: French and Belgian socialists have paraded it continually since
1848, but for all that is of English origin. During the rapid and
powerful development of Chartism among the English workers that followed
the crisis of 1837, the ‘holy month’ – a suspension of work on a
national scale – was preached as early as 1839, and was received with
such favour that in July 1842 the factory workers of the north of
England attempted to carry it out. And at the Congress of the
Alliancists at Geneva on September 1, 1873, the general strike played a
great part, but it was admitted on all sides to carry it out it was
necessary to have a perfect organisation of the working-class and a full
war chest. And that is the crux of the question. On the one hand, the
governments, especially if they are encouraged by the workers’
abstention from political action, will never allow the funds of the
workers to become large enough, and on the other hand, political events
and the encroachments of the ruling class will bring about the
liberation of the workers long before the proletariat gets the length of
forming this ideal organisation and this colossal reserve fund. But if
they had these, they would not need to make use of the roundabout way of
the general strike in order to attain their object.”

Here we have the reasoning that was characteristic of the attitude of
international social democracy towards the mass strike in the following
decades. It is based on the anarchist theory of the general strike –
that is, the theory of the general strike as a means of inaugurating the
social revolution, in contradistinction to the daily political struggle
of the working-class – and exhausts itself in the following simple
dilemma: either the proletariat as a whole are not yet in possession of
the powerful organisation and financial resources required, in which
case they cannot carry through the general strike; or they are already
sufficiently well organised, in which case they do not need the general
strike. This reasoning is so simple and at first glance so irrefutable
that, for a quarter of a century, it has rendered excellent service to
the modern labour movement as a logical weapon against the anarchist
phantom and as a means of carrying out the idea of political struggle to
the widest circles of the workers. The enormous strides taken by the
labour movement in all capitalist countries during the last twenty-five
years are the most convincing evidence of the value of the tactics of
political struggle, which were insisted upon by Marx and Engels in
opposition to Bakuninism; and German social democracy, in its position
of vanguard of the entire international labour movement is not in the
least the direct product of the consistent and energetic application of
these tactics.

The [1905] Russian Revolution has now effected a radical revision of the
above piece of reasoning. For the first time in the history of the class
struggle it has achieved a grandiose realisation of the idea of the mass
strike and – as we shall discuss later – has even matured the general
strike and thereby opened a new epoch in the development of the labour
movement. It does not, of course, follow from this that the tactics of
political struggle recommended by Marx and Engels were false or that
criticism applied by them to anarchism was incorrect. On the contrary,
it is the same train of ideas, the same method, the Engels-Marxian
tactics, which lay at the foundation of the previous practice of the
German social democracy, which now in the Russian Revolution are
producing new factors and new conditions in the class struggle. The
Russian Revolution, which is the first historical experiment on the
model of the class strike, not merely does not afford a vindication of
anarchism, but actually means _the historical liquidation of anarchism_.
The sorry existence to which this mental tendency was condemned in
recent decades by the powerful development of social democracy in
Germany may, to a certain extent, be explained by the exclusive
domination and long duration of the parliamentary period. A tendency
patterned entirely upon the “first blow” and “direct action,” a tendency
“revolutionary” in the most naked pitchfork sense, can only temporarily
languish in the calm of parliamentarian day and, on a return of the
period of direct open struggle, can come to life again and unfold its
inherent strength.

Russia, in particular, appeared to have become the experimental field
for the heroic deeds of anarchism. A country in which the proletariat
had absolutely no political rights and extremely weak organisations, a
many-coloured complex of various sections of the population, a chaos of
conflicting interests, a low standard of education amongst the masses of
the people, extreme brutality in the use of violence on the part of the
prevailing regime – all this seemed as if created to raise anarchism to
a sudden if perhaps short-lived power. And finally, Russia was the
historical birthplace of anarchism. But the fatherland of Bakunin was to
become the burial-place of his teachings. Not only did and do the
anarchists in Russia not stand at the head of the mass strike movement;
not only does the whole political leadership of revolutionary action and
also of the mass strike lie in the hands of the social democratic
organisations, which are bitterly opposed as “bourgeois parties” by
Russian anarchists, or partly in the hands of such socialist
organisations as are more or less influenced by the social democracy and
more or less approximate to it – such as the terrorist party, the
“socialist revolutionaries” – but the anarchists simply do not exist as
a serious political tendency in the Russian Revolution. Only in a small
Lithuanian town with particularly difficult conditions – a confused
medley of different nationalities among the workers, an extremely
scattered condition of small-scale industry, a very severely oppressed
proletariat – in Bialystok, there is, amongst the seven or eight
different revolutionary groups a handful of half-grown “anarchists” who
promote confusion and bewilderment amongst the workers to the best of
their ability; and lastly in Moscow, and perhaps in two or three other
towns, a handful of people of this kidney make themselves noticeable.

But apart from these few “revolutionary” groups, what is the actual role
of anarchism in the Russian Revolution? It has become the sign of the
common thief and plunderer; a large proportion of the innumerable thefts
and acts of plunder of private persons are carried out under the name of
“anarchist-communism” – acts which rise up like a troubled wave against
the revolution in every period of depression and in every period of
temporary defensive. Anarchism has become in the Russian Revolution, not
the theory of the struggling proletariat, but the ideological signboard
of the counter-revolutionary lumpenproletariat, who, like a school of
sharks, swarm in the wake of the battleship of the revolution. And
therewith the historical career of anarchism is well-nigh ended.

On the other hand, the mass strike in Russia has been realised not as
means of evading the political struggle of the working-class, and
especially of parliamentarism, not as a means of jumping suddenly into
the social revolution by means of a theatrical coup, but as a means,
firstly, of creating for the proletariat the conditions of the daily
political struggle and especially of parliamentarism. The revolutionary
struggle in Russia, in which mass strikes are the most important weapon,
is, by the working people, and above all by the proletariat, conducted
for those political rights and conditions whose necessity and importance
in the struggle for the emancipation of the working-class Marx and
Engels first pointed out, and in opposition to anarchism fought for with
all their might in the International. Thus has historical dialectics,
the rock on which the whole teaching of Marxian socialism rests, brought
it about that today anarchism, with which the idea of the mass strike is
indissolubly associated, has itself come to be opposed to the mass
strike which was combated as the opposite of the political activity of
the proletariat, appears today as the most powerful weapon of the
struggle for political rights. If, therefore, the Russian Revolution
makes imperative a fundamental revision of the old standpoint of Marxism
on the question of the mass strike, it is once again Marxism whose
general method and points of view have thereby, in new form, carried off
the prize. The Moor’s beloved can die only by the hand of the Moor.



II. THE MASS STRIKE, A HISTORICAL AND NOT AN ARTIFICIAL PRODUCT


 

The first revision of the question of the mass strike which results from
the experience of Russia relates to the general conception of the
problem. Till the present time the zealous advocates of an “attempt with
the mass strike” in Germany of the stamp of Bernstein, Eisner, etc., and
also the strongest opponents of such an attempt as represented in the
trade-union camp by, for example, Bombelburg, stand when all is said and
done, on the same conception, and that is the anarchist one. The
apparent polar opposites do not mutually exclude each other but, as
always, condition, and at the same time, supplement each other. For the
anarchist mode of thought is direct speculation on the “great
_Kladderadatsch_,“ on the social revolution merely as an external and
inessential characteristic. According to it, what is essential is the
whole abstract, unhistorical view of the mass strike and of all the
conditions of the proletarian struggle generally.

For the anarchist there exist only two things as material suppositions
of his “revolutionary” speculations – first, imagination, and second
goodwill and courage to rescue humanity from the existing capitalist
vale of tears. This fanciful mode of reasoning sixty years ago gave the
result that the mass strike was the shortest, surest and easiest means
of springing into the better social future. The same mode of reasoning
recently gave the result that the trade-union struggle was the only real
“direct action of the masses” and also the only real revolutionary
struggle – which, as is well known, is the latest notion of the French
and Italian “syndicalists.” The fatal thing for anarchism has always
been that the methods of struggle improvised in the air were not only a
reckoning without their host, that is, they were purely utopian, but
that they, while not reckoning in the least with the despised evil
reality, unexpectedly became in this evil reality, practical helps to
the reaction, where previously they had only been, for the most part,
revolutionary speculations.

On the same ground of abstract, unhistorical methods of observation
stand those today who would, in the manner of a board of directors, put
the mass strike in Germany on the calendar on an appointed day, and
those who, like the participants in the trade-union congress at Cologne,
would by a prohibition of “propaganda” eliminate the problem of the mass
strike from the face of the earth. Both tendencies proceed on the common
purely anarchistic assumption that the mass strike is a purely technical
means of struggle which can be “decided” at their pleasure and strictly
according to conscience, or “forbidden” – a kind of pocket-knife which
can be kept in the pocket clasped “ready for any emergency,” and
according to the decision, can be unclasped and used. The opponents of
the mass strike do indeed claim for themselves the merit of taking into
consideration the historical groundwork and the material conditions of
the present conditions in Germany in opposition to the “revolutionary
romanticists” who hover in the air, and do not at any point reckon with
the hard realities and the possibilities and impossibilities. “Facts and
figures; figures and facts!” they cry, like Mr. Gradgrind in Dickens’
HARD TIMES.

What the trade-union opponent of the mass strike understands by the
“historical basis” and “material conditions” is two things – on the one
hand the weakness of the proletariat, and on the other hand, the
strength of Prussian-German militarism. The inadequate organisation of
the workers and the imposing Prussian bayonet – these are the facts and
figures upon which these trade-union leaders base their practical policy
in the given case. Now it is quite true that the trade-union cash box
and the Prussian bayonet are material and very historical phenomena, but
the conception based upon them is not historical materialism in Marx’s
sense but a policemanlike materialism in the sense of Puttkammer. The
representatives of the capitalist police state reckon on much, and
indeed, exclusively, with the occasional real power of the organised
proletariat as well as with the material might of the bayonet, and from
the comparative example of these two rows of figures the comforting
conclusion is always drawn that the revolutionary labour movement is
produced by individual demagogues and agitators; and that therefore
there is in the prisons and bayonets an adequate means of subduing the
unpleasant “passing phenomena.”

The class-conscious German workers have at last grasped the humour of
the policemanlike theory that the whole modern labour movement is an
artificial, arbitrary product of a handful of conscienceless “demagogues
and agitators.”

It is exactly the same conception, however, that finds expression when
two or three worthy comrades unite in a voluntary column of
night-watchmen in order to warn the German working-class against the
dangerous agitation of a few “revolutionary romanticists” and their
“propaganda of the mass strike”; or, when on the other side, a noisy
indignation campaign is engineered by those who, by means of
“confidential” agreements between the executive of the party and the
general commission of the trade unions, believe they can prevent the
outbreak of the mass strike in Germany.

If it depended on the inflammatory “propaganda” of revolutionary
romanticists or on confidential or public decisions of the party
direction, then we should not even yet have had in Russia a single
serious mass strike. In no country in the world – as I pointed out in
March 1905 in the SÄCHSISCHE ARBEITERZEITUNG – was the mass strike so
little “propagated” or even “discussed” as in Russia. And the isolated
examples of decisions and agreements of the Russian party executive
which really sought to proclaim the mass strike of their own accord –
as, for example, the last attempt in August of this year after the
dissolution of the Duma – are almost valueless.

If, therefore, the Russian Revolution teaches us anything, it teaches
above all that the mass strike is not artificially “made,” not “decided”
at random, not “propagated,” but that it is a historical phenomenon
which, at a given moment, results from social conditions with historical
inevitability. It is not, therefore, by abstract speculations on the
possibility or impossibility, the utility or the injuriousness of the
mass strike, but only by an examination of those factors and social
conditions out of which the mass strike grows in the present phase of
the class struggle – in other words, it is not by _subjective criticism_
of the mass strike from the standpoint of what is desirable, but only by
_objective investigation_ of the sources of the mass strike from the
standpoint of what is historically inevitable, that the problem can be
grasped or even discussed.

In the unreal sphere of abstract logical analysis it can be shown with
exactly the same force on either side that the mass strike is absolutely
impossible and sure to be defeated, and that it is possible and that its
triumph cannot be questioned. And therefore the value of the evidence
led on each side is exactly the same – and that is nil. Therefore, the
fear of the “propagation” of the mass strike, which has even led to
formal anathamas against the persons alleged to be guilty of this crime,
is solely the product of the droll confusion of persons. It is just as
impossible to “propagate” the mass strike as an abstract means of
struggle as it is to propagate the “revolution.” “Revolution” like “mass
strike” signifies nothing but an external form of the class struggle,
which can have sense and meaning only in connection with definite
political situations.

If anyone were to undertake to make the mass strike generally, as a form
of proletarian action, the object of methodological agitation, and to go
house-to-house canvassing with this “idea” in order to gradually win the
working-class to it, it would be as idle and profitless and absurd an
occupation as it would be to seek to make the idea of the revolution or
of the fight at the barricades the object of a special agitation. The
mass strike has now become the centre of the lively interest of the
German and the international working-class because it is a new form of
struggle, and as such is the sure symptom of a thoroughgoing internal
revolution in the relations of the classes and in the conditions of the
class struggle. It is a testimony to the sound revolutionary instinct
and to the quick intelligence of the mass of the German proletariat
that, in spite of the obstinate resistance of their trade-union leaders,
they are applying themselves to this new problem with such keen
interest.

But it does not meet the case, in the presence of this interest and of
this fine, intellectual thirst and desire for revolutionary deeds on the
part of the workers, to treat them to abstract mental gymnastics on the
possibility or impossibility of the mass strike; they should be
enlightened on the development of the Russian Revolution, the
international significance of that revolution, the sharpening of class
antagonisms in Western Europe, the wider political perspectives of the
class struggle in Germany, and the role and the tasks of the masses in
the coming struggles. Only in this form will the discussion on the mass
strike lead to the widening of the intellectual horizon of the
proletariat, to the sharpening of their way of thinking, and to the
steeling of their energy.

Viewed from this standpoint however, the criminal proceedings desired by
the enemies of “revolutionary romanticism” appear in all their
absurdity, because, in treating of the problem, one does not adhere
strictly to the text of the Jena resolution. The “practical politicians”
agree to this resolution if need be, because they couple the mass strike
chiefly with the fate of universal suffrage, from which it follows that
they can believe in two things – first, that the mass strike is of a
purely defensive character, and second, that the mass strike is even
subordinate to parliamentarism, that is, has been turned into a mere
appendage of parliamentarism. But the real kernel of the Jena resolution
in this connection is that in the present position of Germany an attempt
on the part of the prevailing reaction on the parliamentary vote would
in all probability be the moment for the introduction of, and the signal
for, a period of stormy political struggles in which the mass strike as
a means of struggle in Germany might well come into use for the first
time.

But to seek to narrow and to artificially smother the social importance,
and to limit the historical scope, of the mass strike as a phenomenon
and as a problem of the class struggle by the wording of a congress
resolution is an undertaking which for short-sightedness can only be
compared with the veto on discussion of the trade-union congress at
Cologne. In the resolution of the Jena Congress, German social democracy
has officially taken notice of the fundamental change which the Russian
Revolution [of 1905] has effected in the international conditions of the
proletarian class struggle, and has announced its capacity for
revolutionary development and its power of adaptability to the new
demands of the coming phase of the class struggle. Therein lies the
significance of the Jena resolution. As for the peaceful application of
the mass strike in Germany, history will decide that as it decided it in
Russia – history in which German social democracy with its decisions is,
it is true, an important factor, but, at the same time, only _one_
factor amongst many.



III. DEVELOPMENT OF THE MASS STRIKE MOVEMENT IN RUSSIA


 

The mass strike, as it appears for the most part in the discussion in
Germany, is a very clear and simply thought out, sharply sketched
isolated phenomenon. It is the political mass strike exclusively that is
spoken of. What is meant by it is a single grand rising of the
industrial proletariat springing from some political motive of the
highest importance, and undertaken on the basis of an opportune and
mutual understanding on the part of the controlling authorities of the
new party and of the trade unions, and carried through in the spirit of
party discipline and in perfect order, and in still more perfect order
brought to the directing committees as a signal given at the proper
time, by which committees the regulation of support, the cost, the
sacrifice – in a word, the whole material balance of the mass strike –
is exactly determined in advance.

Now, when we compare this theoretical scheme with the real mass strike,
as it appeared in Russia five years ago, we are compelled to say that
this representation, which in the German discussion occupies the central
position, hardly corresponds to a single one of the many mass strikes
that have taken place, and on the other hand that the mass strike in
Russia displays such a multiplicity of the most varied forms of action
that it is altogether impossible to speak of “the” mass strike, of an
abstract schematic mass strike. All the factors of the mass strike, as
well as its character, are not only different in the different towns and
districts of the country, but its general character has often changed in
the course of the revolution. The mass strike has passed through a
definite history in Russia, and is passing still further through it.
Who, therefore, speaks of the mass strike in Russia must, above all
things, keep its history before his eyes.

The present official period, so to speak, of the Russian Revolution is
justly dated from the rising of the proletariat on January 22, 1905,
when the demonstration of 200,000 workers ended in a frightful bloodbath
before the czar’s palace. The bloody massacre in St. Petersburg was, as
is well known, the signal for the outbreak of the first gigantic series
of mass strikes which spread over the whole of Russia within a few days
and which carried the call to action of the revolution from St.
Petersburg to every corner of the empire and amongst the widest sections
of the proletariat. But the St. Petersburg rising of January 22 was only
the critical moment of a mass strike, which the proletariat of the
czarist capital had previously entered upon in January 1905. The January
mass strike was without doubt carried through under the immediate
influence of the gigantic general strike, which in December 1904 broke
out in the Caucasus, in Baku, and for a long time kept the whole of
Russia in suspense. The events of December in Baku were on their part
only the last and powerful ramification of those tremendous mass strikes
which, like a periodic earthquake, shook the whole of south Russia, and
whose prologue was the mass strike in Batum in the Caucasus in March
1902.

This first mass strike movement in the continuous series of present
revolutionary eruptions is finally separated by five or six years from
the great general strike of the textile workers in St. Petersburg in
1896 and 1897, and if this movement is apparently separated from the
present revolution by a few years of apparent stagnation and strong
reaction, everyone who knows the inner political development of the
Russian proletariat to their present stage of class consciousness and
revolutionary energy will realise that the history of the present period
of the mass struggles begins with those general strikes in St.
Petersburg. They are therefore important for the problems of the mass
strike because they already contain, in the germ, all the principal
factors of later mass strikes.

Again, the St. Petersburg general strike of 1896 appears as a purely
economic partial wage struggle. Its causes were the intolerable working
conditions of the spinners and weavers in St. Petersburg; a working day
of thirteen, fourteen or fifteen hours, miserable piecework rates, and a
whole series of contemptible chicaneries on the part of the employers.
The workers, however, patiently endured this condition of things, for a
long time till an apparently trivial circumstance filled the cup to
overflowing. The coronation of the present czar, Nicholas II, which had
been postponed for two years through fear of the revolutionaries, was
celebrated in May 1896, and on that occasion the St. Petersburg
employers displayed their patriotic zeal by giving their workers three
days compulsory holidays, for which, curious to relate, they did not
desire to pay their employees. The workers angered by this began to
move. After a conference of about three hundred of the intelligent
workers in the Ekaterinhof Garden a strike was decided upon, and the
following demands were formulated: first, payment of wages for the
coronation holidays; second, a working day of ten hours; third,
increased rates for piecework. This happened on May 24. In a week every
weaving and spinning establishment was at a standstill and 40,000
workers were in the general strike. Today, this event, measured by the
gigantic mass strike of the revolution, may appear a little thing. In
the political polar rigidity of the Russia of that time a general strike
was something unheard of; it was even a complete revolution in little.
There began, of course, the most brutal persecution. About one thousand
workers were arrested and the general strike was suppressed.

Here, already, we see all the fundamental characteristics of the later
mass strikes. The next occasion of the movement was wholly accidental,
even unimportant, its outbreak elementary; but in the success of the
movement the fruits of the agitation, extending over several years, of
the social democracy were seen and in the course of the general strike
the social democratic agitators stood at the head of the movement,
directed it, and used it to stir up revolutionary agitation. Further,
the strike was outwardly a mere economic struggle for wages, but the
attitude of the government and the agitation of the social democracy
made it a political phenomenon of the first rank. And lastly, the strike
was suppressed; the workers suffered a “defeat.” But in January of the
following year the textile workers of St. Petersburg repeated the
general strike once more and achieved this time a remarkable success:
the legal introduction of a working day of eleven hours throughout the
whole of Russia. What was nevertheless a much more important result was
this: since the first general strike of 1896 which was entered upon
without a trace of organisation or of strike funds, an intensive
trade-union fight began in Russia proper which spread from St.
Petersburg to the other parts of the country and opened up entirely new
vistas to social democratic agitation and organisation, and by which to
the apparently death-like peace of the following period, the revolution
was prepared for by underground work.

The outbreak of the Caucasian strike in March 1902 was apparently as
accidental and as much due to pure economic partial causes (although
produced by quite other factors) as that of 1896. It was connected with
the serious industrial and commercial crisis which, in Russia, was the
precursor of the Japanese war and which, together with it, was the most
powerful factor of the nascent revolutionary ferment. The crisis
produced an enormous mass of unemployment which nourished the agitation
amongst the proletarian masses, and therefore the government, to restore
tranquillity amongst the workers, undertook to transport the
“superfluous hands” in batches to their respective home districts. One
such measure, which was to affect about four hundred petroleum workers
called forth a mass protest in Batum, which led to demonstrations,
arrests, a massacre, and finally to a political trial in which the
purely economic and partial affair suddenly became a political and
revolutionary event. The reverberation of the wholly “fruitless”
expiring and suppressed strike in Batum was a series of revolutionary
mass demonstrations of workers in Nizhni Novgorod, Saratov, and other
towns, and therefore a mighty surge forward of the general wave of the
revolutionary movement.

Already in November 1902 the first genuine revolutionary echo followed
in the shape of a general strike at Rostov-on-Don. Disputes about the
rates of pay in the workshops of the Vladicaucasus Railway gave the
impetus to this movement. The management sought to reduce wages and
therefore the Don committee of social democracy issued a proclamation
with a summons to strike for the following demands: a nine-hour day,
increase in wages, abolition of fines, dismissal of obnoxious engineers,
etc. Entire railway workshops participated in the strike. Presently all
other industries joined in and suddenly an unprecedented state of
affairs prevailed in Rostov: every industrial work was at a standstill,
and every day monster meetings of fifteen to twenty thousand were held
in the open air, sometimes surrounded by a cordon of Cossacks, at which
for the first time social democratic popular speakers appeared publicly,
inflammatory speeches on socialism and political freedom were delivered
and received with immense enthusiasm, and revolutionary appeals were
distributed by tens of thousands of copies. In the midst of rigid
absolutist Russia the proletariat of Rostov won for the first time the
right of assembly and freedom of speech by storm. It goes without saying
that there was a massacre here. The disputes over wages in the
Vladicaucasus Railway workshops grew in a few days into a political
general strike and a revolutionary street battle. As an echo to this
there followed immediately a general strike at the station of
Tichoretzkaia on the same railway. Here also a massacre took place and
also a trial, and thus even Tichoretzkaia has taken its place in the
indissoluble chain of the factors of the revolution.

The spring of 1903 gave the answer to the defeated strikes in Rostov and
Tichoretzkaia; the whole of South Russia in May, June and July was
aflame. Baku, Tiflis, Batum, Elisavetgrad, Odessa, Kiev, Nikolaev and
Ekaterinoslav were in a general strike in the literal meaning of those
words. But here again the movement did not arise on any preconceived
plan from one another; it flowed together from individual points in each
one from different causes and in a different form. The beginning was
made by Baku where several partial wage struggles in individual
factories and departments culminated in a general strike. In Tiflis, the
strike was begun by 2000 commercial employees who had a working day from
six o’clock in the morning to eleven at night. On the fourth of July
they all left their shops and made a circuit of the town to demand from
the proprietors of the shops that they close their premises. The victory
was complete; the commercial employees won a working day from eight in
the morning to eight in the evening, and all the factories, workshops
and offices, etc, immediately joined them. The newspapers did not
appear, and tramway traffic could not be carried on under military
protection.

In Elisavetgrad on July 4 a strike began in all the factories with
purely economic demands. These were mostly conceded, and the strike
ended on the fourteenth. Two weeks later however it broke out again. The
bakers this time gave the word and the bricklayers, the joiners, the
dyers, the mill-workers, and finally all factory workers joined them.

In Odessa the movement began with a wage struggle in the course of which
the “legal” workers’ union, founded by government agents according to
the programme of the famous gendarme Zubatov, was developed. Historical
dialectics had again seized the occasion to play one if its malicious
little pranks. The economic struggles of the earlier period (amongst
them the great St. Petersburg general strike of 1896) had misled Russian
social democracy into exaggerating the importance of so-called
economics, and in this way the ground had been prepared amongst the
workers for the demagogic activities of Zubatov. After a time, however,
the great revolutionary stream turned round the little ship with the
false flag and compelled it to ride right at the head of the
revolutionary proletarian flotilla. The Zubatovian unions gave the
signal for the great general strike in Odessa in the spring of 1904, as
for the general strike in St. Petersburg in January 1905. The workers of
Odessa, who were not to be deceived by the appearance of friendliness on
the part of the government for the workers, and of its sympathy with
purely economic strikes, suddenly demanded proof by example, and
compelled the Zubatovian “workers union” in a factory to declare a
strike for very moderate demands. They were immediately thrown on the
streets, and when they demanded the protection of the authorities which
was promised them by their leader, the gentleman vanished and left the
workers in the wildest excitement.

The social democrats at once placed themselves at the head of affairs,
and the strike movement extended to other factories. On the first day of
July 2,500 dockers struck work for an increase of wages from eighty
kopecks to two rubles, and the shortening of the work day by
half-an-hour. On the sixteenth day of July the seamen joined the
movement. On the thirteenth day the tramway staff began a strike. Then a
meeting took place of all the strikers, seven or eight thousand men;
they formed a procession which went from factory to factory, growing
like an avalanche, and presently a crowd of forty to fifty thousand
betook themselves to the docks in order to bring all work there to a
standstill. A general strike soon reigned throughout the whole city.

In Kiev, a strike began in the railway workshops on July 21st. Here,
also, the immediate cause was miserable conditions of labour, and wage
demands were presented. On the following day the foundry men followed
the example. On July 23rd, an incident occurred which gave the signal
for the general strike. During the night two delegates of the railwaymen
were arrested. The strikers immediately demanded their release, and as
this was not conceded, they decided not to allow trains to leave the
town. At the station all the strikers with their wives and families sat
down on the railway track – a sea of human beings. They were threatened
with rifle salvoes. The workers bared their breasts and cried, “Shoot!”
A salvo was fired into the defenceless seated crowd, and thirty to forty
corpses, amongst them women and children, remained on the ground. On
this becoming known the whole town of Kiev went on strike on the same
day. The corpses of the murdered workers were raised on high by the
crowd and carried round in a mass demonstration. Meetings, speeches,
arrests, isolated street fights – Kiev was in the midst of the
revolution. The movement was soon at an end. But the printers had won a
shortening of the working day by one hour and a wage increase of one
rouble; in a yeast factory the eight-hour day was introduced; the
railway workshops were closed by order of the ministry; other
departments continued partial strikes for their demands.

In Nikolaev, the general strike broke out under the immediate influence
of news from Odessa, Baku, Batum and Tiflis, in spite of the opposition
of the social democratic committee who wanted to postpone the outbreak
of the movement till the time came when the military should have left
the town for manoeuvres. The masses refused to hold back; one factory
made a beginning, the strikes went from one workshop to another, the
resistance of the military only poured oil on the fire. Mass processions
with revolutionary songs were formed in which all workers, employees,
tramways officials, men and women took part. The cessation of work was
complete. In Ekaterinoslav, the bakers came out on strike on August 5,
on the seventh the men in the railway workshops, and then all the other
factories on August 8. Tramway traffic stopped, and the newspapers did
not appear.

Thus, the colossal general strike in south Russia came into being in the
summer of 1903. By many small channels of partial economic struggles and
little “accidental” occurrences it flowed rapidly to a raging sea, and
changed the entire south of the czarist empire for some weeks into a
bizarre revolutionary workers’ republic. “Brotherly embraces, cries of
delight and of enthusiasm, songs of freedom, merry laughter, humour and
joy were seen and heard in the crowd of many thousands of persons which
surged through the town from morning till evening. The mood was exalted;
one could almost believe that a new, better life was beginning on the
earth. A most solemn and at the same time an idyllic, moving spectacle.”
... So wrote at the time the correspondent of the Liberal OSVOBOSHDENYE
of Peter Struve.

The year 1904 brought with it war, and for a time, an interval of quiet
in the mass strike movement. At first a troubled wave of “patriotic”
demonstrations arranged by the police authorities spread over the
country. The “liberal” bourgeois society was for the time being struck
to the ground by the czarist official chauvinism. But soon the social
democrats took possession of the arena; revolutionary workers’
demonstrations were opposed to the demonstrations of the patriotic
lumpenproletariat, which were organised under police patronage. At last,
the shameful defeats of the czarist army woke the liberal society from
its lethargy; then began the era of democratic congresses, banquets,
speeches, addresses and manifestos. Absolutism, temporarily suppressed
through the disgrace of the war, gave full scope to these gentlemen, and
by and by they saw everything in rosy colours. For six months bourgeois
liberalism occupied the centre of the stage and the proletariat remained
in the shadows. But after a long depression, absolutism again roused
itself, the camarilla gathered all its strength and by a single,
powerful movement of the Cossack’s heel the whole liberal movement was
driven into a corner. Banquets, speeches, and congresses were prohibited
out of hand as “intolerable presumption,” and liberalism suddenly found
itself at the end of its tether.

But exactly at the point where liberalism was exhausted, the action of
the proletariat began. In December 1904 the great general strike due to
unemployment broke out in Baku; the working-class was again on the field
of battle. As speech was forbidden and rendered impossible, action
began. In Baku for some weeks in the midst of the general strike the
social democrats ruled as absolute masters of the situation; and the
peculiar events of December in the Caucasus would have caused an
immediate sensation if they had not been so quickly put in the shade by
the rising tide of the revolution. The fantastic confused news of the
general strike in Baku had not reached all parts of the czarist empire
when in January 1905; the mass strike in St. Petersburg broke out.

Here also, as is well known, the immediate cause was trivial. Two men
employed at the Putilov works were discharged on account of their
membership in the legal Zubatovian union. This measure called forth a
solidarity strike on January 16 of the whole of the 12,000 employed in
this works. The social democrats seized the occasion of the strike to
begin a lively agitation for the extension of the demands and set forth
demands for the eight-hour day, the right of combination, freedom of
speech and of the press, etc. The unrest among the Putilov workers
communicated itself quickly to the remainder of the proletariat, and in
a few days 140,000 workers were on strike. Joint conferences and stormy
discussions led to the working out of that proletarian charter of
bourgeois freedom with the eight-hour day at its head with which, on
January 22nd, 200,000 workers led by Father Gapon, marched to the czar’s
palace. The conflict of the two Putilov workers who had been subjected
to disciplinary punishment had changed within a week into the prologue
of the most violent revolution in modern times.

The events that followed upon this are well known, the bloodbath in St.
Petersburg called forth gigantic mass strikes and general strike in the
month of January, and February in all the industrial centres and towns
in Russia, Poland, Lithuania, the Baltic Provinces, the Caucasus,
Siberia, from north to south and east to west. On closer inspection,
however, it can be seen that the mass strike was appearing in other
forms than those of the previous period. Everywhere at that time the
social democratic organisations went before with appeals; everywhere was
revolutionary solidarity with the St. Petersburg proletariat expressly
stated as the cause and aim of the general strike; everywhere, at the
same time, there were demonstrations, speeches, conflicts with the
military.

But even here there was no predetermined plan, no organised action,
because the appeals of the parties could scarcely keep pace with the
spontaneous risings of the masses; the leaders had scarcely time to
formulate the watchwords of the onrushing crowd of the proletariat.
Further, the earlier mass and general strikes had originated from
individual coalescing wage struggles which, in the general temper of the
revolutionary situation and under the influence of the social democratic
agitation, rapidly became political demonstrations; the economic factor
and the scattered condition of trade unionism were the starting point;
all-embracing class action and political direction the result. The
movement was now reversed.

The general strikes of January and February broke out as unified
revolutionary actions to begin with under the direction of the social
democrats; but this action soon fell into an unending series of local,
partial, economic strikes in separate districts, towns, departments and
factories. Throughout the whole of the spring of 1905 and into the
middle of the summer there fermented throughout the whole of the immense
empire an uninterrupted economic strike of almost the entire proletariat
against capital – a struggle which caught, on the one hand, all the
petty bourgeois and liberal professions, commercial employees,
technicians, actors and members of artistic professions – and on the
other hand, penetrated to the domestic servants, the minor police
officials and even to the stratum of the lumpenproletariat, and
simultaneously surged from the towns to the country districts and even
knocked at the iron gates of the military barracks.

This is a gigantic, many-coloured picture of a general arrangement of
labour and capital which reflects all the complexity of social
organisation and of the political consciousness of every section and of
every district; and the whole long scale runs from the regular
trade-union struggle of a picked and tested troop of the proletariat
drawn from large-scale industry, to the formless protest of a handful of
rural proletarians, and to the first slight stirrings of an agitated
military garrison, from the well-educated and elegant revolt in cuffs
and white collars in the counting house of a bank to the shy-bold
murmurings of a clumsy meeting of dissatisfied policemen in a
smoke-grimed dark and dirty guardroom.

According to the theory of the lovers of “orderly and well-disciplined”
struggles, according to plan and scheme, according to those especially
who always ought to know better from afar “how it should have been
done,” the decay of the great political general strike of January 1905
into a number of economic struggles was probably “a great mistake” which
crippled that action and changed it into a “straw fire.” But social
democracy in Russia, which had taken part in the revolution but had not
“made” it, and which had even to learn its law from its course itself,
was at the first glance put out of countenance for a time by the
apparently fruitless ebb of the storm-flood of the general strike.
History, however, which had made that “great mistake,” thereby
accomplished, heedless of the reasonings of its officious schoolmaster,
a gigantic work for the revolution which was as inevitable as it was, in
its consequences, incalculable.

The sudden general rising of the proletariat in January under the
powerful impetus of the St. Petersburg events was outwardly a political
act of the revolutionary declaration of war on absolutism. But this
first general direct action reacted inwardly all the more powerfully as
it for the first time awoke class feeling and class-consciousness in
millions upon millions as if by an electric shock. And this awakening of
class feeling expressed itself forthwith in the circumstances that the
proletarian mass, counted by millions, quite suddenly and sharply came
to realise how intolerable was that social and economic existence which
they had patiently endured for decades in the chains of capitalism.
Thereupon, there began a spontaneous general shaking of and tugging at
these chains. All the innumerable sufferings of the modern proletariat
reminded them of the old bleeding wounds. Here was the eight-hour day
fought for, there piece-work was resisted, here were brutal foremen
“driven off” in a sack on a handcar, at another place infamous systems
of fines were fought against, everywhere better wages were striven for
and here and there the abolition of homework. Backward, degraded
occupations in large towns, small provincial towns, which had hitherto
dreamed in an idyllic sleep, the village with its legacy from feudalism
– all these, suddenly awakened by the January lightning, bethought
themselves of their rights and now sought feverishly to make up for
their previous neglect.

Here, the economic struggle was not really a decay, a dissipation of
action, but merely change of front, a sudden and natural alteration of
the first general engagement with absolutism, in a general reckoning
with capital, which in keeping with its character assumed the form of
individual, scattered wage struggles. Political class action was not
broken in January by the decay of the general strike into economic
strikes, but the reverse, after the possible content of political action
in the given situation and at the given stage of the revolution was
exhausted, it broke, or rather changed, into economic action.

In point of fact, what more could the general strike in January have
achieved? Only complete thoughtlessness could expect that absolutism
could be destroyed at one blow by a single “long-drawn” general strike
after the anarchist plan. Absolutism in Russia must be overthrown by the
proletariat. But in order to be able to overthrow it, the proletariat
requires a high degree of political education, of class-consciousness
and organisation. All these conditions cannot be fulfilled by pamphlets
and leaflets, but only by the living political school, by the fight and
in the fight, in the continuous course of the revolution. Further,
absolutism cannot be overthrown at any desired moment in which only
adequate “exertion” and “endurance” is necessary. The fall of absolutism
is merely the outer expression of the inner social and class development
of Russian society.

Before absolutism can, and so far that it may, be overthrown, the
bourgeois Russia in its interior, in its modern class divisions, must be
formed. That requires the drawing together of the various social layers
and interests, besides the education of the proletarian revolutionary
parties, and not less of the liberal, radical petty bourgeois,
conservative and reactionary parties; it requires self-consciousness,
self-knowledge and the class-consciousness not merely of the layers of
the people, but also of the layers of the bourgeoisie. But this also can
be achieved and come to fruition in no way but in the struggle, in the
process of revolution itself, through the actual school of experience,
in collision with the proletariat as well as with one another, in
incessant mutual friction. This class division and class maturity of
bourgeois society, as well as its action in the struggle against
absolutism, is on the one hand, hampered and made difficult by the
peculiar leading role of the proletariat and, on the other hand, is
spurred on and accelerated. The various undercurrents of the social
process of the revolution cross one another, check one another, and
increase the internal contradictions of the revolution, but in the end
accelerate and thereby render still more violent its eruptions.

This apparently simple and purely mechanical problem may therefore be
stated thus: the overthrow of absolutism is a long, continuous social
process, and its solution demands a complete undermining of the soil of
society; the uppermost part be placed lowest and the lowermost part
highest, the apparent “order” must be changed to a chaos, and the
apparently “anarchistic” chaos must be changed into a new order. Now in
this process of the social transformation of old Russia, not only the
January lightning of the first general strike, but also the spring and
summer thunderstorms that followed it, played an indispensable part. The
embittered general relations of wage labour and capital contributed in
equal measure to the drawing together of the various layers of the
people and those of the bourgeoisie, to the class-consciousness of the
revolutionary proletariat and to that of the liberal and conservative
bourgeoisie. And just as the urban wage struggle contributed to the
formation of a strong monarchist industrial party in Moscow, so the
conflagration of the violent rural rising in Livonia led to the rapid
liquidation of the famous aristocratic-agrarian zemstvo liberalism.

But at the same time, the period of the economic struggles of the spring
and summer of 1905 made it possible for the urban proletariat, by means
of active social democratic agitation and direction, to assimilate later
all the lessons of the January prologue and to grasp clearly all the
further tasks of the revolution. There was connected with this too,
another circumstance of an enduring social character: _a general raising
of the standard of life of the proletariat_, economic, social and
intellectual.

The January strikes of 1905 ended victoriously almost throughout. As
proof of this some data from the enormous, and still for the most part,
inaccessible mass of material may be cited here relating to a few of the
most important strikes carried through in Warsaw alone by the social
democrats of Poland and Lithuania. In the great factories of the metal
industry of Warsaw: Lilpos Ltd.; Ran and Lowenstein; Rudzki and Co.;
Borman, Schwede and Co.; Handtke, Gerlach and Pulst; Geisler Bros.;
Eberherd, Wolski and Co.; Konrad and Yanruszkiewicz Ltd.; Weber and
Daehu; Ewizdzinski and Co.; Wolonski Wire Works; Gostynski and Co.,
Ltd.; Rrun and Son; Frage Norblin; Werner; Buch; Kenneberg Bros.;
Labour; Dittunar Lamp Factory; Serkowski; Weszk – twenty-two factories
in all, the workers won after a strike of four to five weeks (from
January 24–26) a nine-hour day, a 25 per cent increase of wages and
obtained various smaller concessions. In the large workshops of the
timber industry of Warsaw, namely Karmanski, Damieki, Gromel,
Szerbinskik, Twemerowski, Horn, Devensee, Tworkowski, Daab and Martens –
twelve workshops in all – the strikes had won by the twenty-third of
February the nine-hour day, which they also won, together with an
increase in wages, after a further strike of a week.

The entire bricklaying industry began a strike on February 27 and
demanded, in conformity with the watchword of social democracy, the
eight-hour day; they won the ten-hour day on March 11 together with an
increase of wages for all categories, regular weekly payment of wages,
etc. The painters, the cartwrights, the saddlers and the smiths all won
the eight-hour day without decrease of wages.

The telephone workshops struck for ten days and won the eight-hour day
and an increase of wages of 10 to 15 per cent. The large linen-weaving
establishment of Hielle and Dietrich (10,000 workers) after a strike
lasting nine weeks, obtained a decrease of the working day by one hour
and a wage increase of 5 to 10 per cent. And similar results in endless
variation were to be seen in the older branches of industry in Warsaw,
Lodz, and Sosnovitz.

In Russia proper the eight-hour day was won in December 1904 by a few
categories of oil workers in Baku; in May 1905 by the sugar workers of
the Kiev district; in January 1905 all the printing works in Samara
(where at the same time an increase of piecework rates was obtained and
fines were abolished); in February in the factory in which medical
instruments for the army are manufactured, in a furniture factory and in
the cartridge factory in St. Petersburg. Further, the eight-hour day was
introduced in the mines at Vladiviostock, in March in the government
mechanical workshops dealing with government stock and in May among the
employees of the Tiflis electric town railway. In the same month a
working day of eight-and-a-half hours was introduced in the large
cotton-weaving factory of Marosov (and at the same time the abolition of
night work and a wage increase of 8 per cent were won); in June an
eight-hour day in a few oil works in St. Petersburg and Moscow; in July
a working day of eight-and-a-half hours among the smiths at the St.
Petersburg docks; and in November in all the private printing
establishments of the town of Orel (and at the same time an increase of
time rates of 20 per cent and piecework rates of 100 per cent, as well
as the setting up of a conciliation board on which workers and employers
were equally represented.)

The nine-hour day in all the railway workshops (in February), in many
government, military and naval workshops, in most of the factories of
the town of Berdiansk, in all the printing works of the towns of Poltava
and Munsk; nine-and-a-half hours in the shipyards, mechanical workshops
and foundries in the town of Nikolaev, in June, after a general strike
of waiters in Warsaw, in many restaurants and cafes (and at the same
time a wage increase of 20 to 40 per cent, with a two-week holiday in
the year).

The ten-hour day in almost all the factories of the towns of Lodz,
Sosnovitz, Riga, Kovno, Oval, Dorfat, Minsk, Kharkov, in the bakeries of
Odessa, among the mechanics in Kishinev, at a few smelting works in St.
Petersburg, in the match factories of Kovno (with an increase of wages
of 10 per cent), in all the government marine workshops, and amongst all
the dockers.

The wage increases were, in general, smaller than the shortening of
hours but always more significant: in Warsaw in the middle of March 1905
a general increase of wages of 15 per cent was fixed by the municipal
factories department; in the centre of the textile industry, Ivanovo
Vosnesensk, the wage increase amounted to 7 to 15 per cent, in Kovno the
increase affected 73 per cent of the workers. A fixed minimum wage was
introduced in some of the bakeries in Odessa, in the Neva shipbuilding
yards in St. Petersburg, etc.

It goes without saying that these concessions were withdrawn again, now
here and now there. This however was only the cause of renewed strife
and led to still more bitter struggles for revenge, and thus the strike
period of the spring of 1905 has of itself become the prologue to an
endless series of ever-spreading and interlacing economic struggles
which have lasted to the present day. In the period of the outward
stagnation of the revolution, when the telegraph carried no sensational
news from the Russian theatre of war to the outside world, and when the
west European laid aside his newspaper in disappointment with the remark
there “was nothing doing” in Russia, the great underground work of the
revolution was in reality being carried on without cessation, day-by-day
and hour-by-hour, in the very heart of the empire. The incessant
intensive economic struggle effected, by rapid and abbreviated methods,
the transition of capitalism from the stage of primitive accumulation,
of patriarchal unmethodical methods of working, to a highly modern,
civilised one.

At the present time the actual working day in Russian industry leaves
behind, not only the Russian factory legislation (that is the legal
working day of eleven hours) but even the actual conditions of Germany.
In most departments of large-scale industry in Russia the ten-hour day
prevails, which in Germany is declared in social legislation to be an
unattainable goal. And what is more, that longed-for “industrial
constitutionalism,” for which there is so much enthusiasm in Germany,
and for the sake of which the advocates of opportunist tactics would
keep ever keen wind from the stagnant waters of their all-suffering
parliamentarism, has already been born, together with political
“constitutionalism,” in the midst of the revolutionary storm, from the
revolution itself! In actual fact it is not merely a general raising of
the standard of life, or the cultural level of the working-class that
has taken place. The material standard of life as a permanent stage of
well-being has no place in the revolution. Full of contradictions and
contrasts it brings simultaneously surprising economic victories and the
most brutal acts of revenge on the part of the capitalists; today the
eight-hour day and tomorrow wholesale lockouts and actual starvation for
the millions.

The most precious, lasting, thing in the rapid ebb and flow of the wave
is its mental sediment: the intellectual, cultural growth of the
proletariat, which proceeds by fits and starts, and which offers an
inviolable guarantee of their further irresistible progress in the
economic as in the political struggle. And not only that. Even the
relations of the worker to the employer are turned round; since the
January general strike and the strikes of 1905 which followed upon it,
the principle of the capitalist “mastery of the house” is de facto
abolished. In the larger factories of all important industrial centres
the establishment of workers’ committees has, as if by itself, taken
place, with which alone the employer negotiates and which decide all
disputes.

And finally another thing, the apparently “chaotic” strikes and the
“disorganised” revolutionary action after the January general strike are
becoming the starting point of a feverish _work of organisation_. Dame
History, from afar, smilingly hoaxes the bureaucratic lay figures who
keep grim watch at the gate over the fate of the German trade unions.
The firm organisations which, as the indispensable hypothesis for an
eventual German mass strike, should be fortified like an impregnable
citadel – these organisations are in Russia, on the contrary, already
born from the mass strike. And while the guardians of the German trade
unions for the most part fear that the organisations will fall in pieces
in a revolutionary whirlwind like rare porcelain, the Russian revolution
shows us the exact opposite picture; from the whirlwind and the storm,
out of the fire and glow of the mass strike and the street fighting rise
again, like Venus from the foam, fresh, young, powerful, buoyant trade
unions.

Here again a little example, which, however, is typical of the whole
empire. At the second conference of the Russian trade unions which took
place at the end of February 1906 in St. Petersburg, the representative
of the Petersburg trade unions, in his report on the development of
trade-union organisations, of the czarist capital said:

“January 22, 1905, which washed away the Gapon union, was a turning
point. The workers in large numbers have learned by experience to
appreciate and understand the importance of organisation, and that only
they themselves can create these organisations. The first trade union –
that of the printers – originated in direct connection with the January
movement. The commission appointed to work out the tariffs framed the
statutes, and on July 19 the union began its existence. Just about this
time the union of office-workers and bookkeepers was called into
existence.”

“In addition to those organisations, which extend almost openly, there
arose from January to October 1905 semi-legal and illegal trade unions.
To the former belonged, for example, the union of chemists’ assistants
and commercial employees. Amongst the illegal unions special attention
must be drawn to the watchmakers’ union, whose first secret session was
held on April 24th. All attempts to convene a general open meeting were
shattered on the obstinate resistance of the police and the employers in
the form of the Chamber of Commerce. This mischance has not prevented
the existence of the union. The tailors and tailoresses union was
founded in 1905 at a meeting in a wood at which seventy tailors were
present. After the question of forming the union was discussed a
commission was appointed which was entrusted with the task of working
out the statutes. All attempts of the commission to obtain a legal
existence for the union were unsuccessful. Its activities were confined
to agitation and the enrolling of new members in the individual
workshops. A similar fate was in store for the shoemakers’ union. In
July, a secret night meeting was convened in a wood near the city. Over
100 shoemakers attended; a report was read on the importance of trade
unionism, on its history in Western Europe and its tasks in Russia. It
was then decided to form a trade union; a commission of twelve was
appointed to work out the statutes and call a general meeting of
shoemakers. The statutes were drawn up, but in the meantime it had not
been found possible to print them nor had the general meeting been
convened.”

These were the first difficult beginnings. Then came the October days,
the second general strike, the czar’s manifesto of October 30 and the
brief “constitution period.” The workers threw themselves with fiery
zeal into the waves of political freedom in order to use it forthwith
for the purpose of the work of organisation. Besides daily political
meetings, debates and the formation of clubs, the development of trade
unionism was immediately taken in hand. In October and November _forty_
new trade unions appeared in St. Petersburg. Presently a “central
bureau,” that is, a trade-union council, was established, various
trade-union papers appeared, and since November a central organ has also
been published, THE TRADE UNION.

What was reported above concerning Petersburg was also true on the whole
of Moscow and Odessa, Kiev and Nikolaev, Saratov and Voronezh, Samara
and Nizhni Novgorod, and all the larger towns of Russia, and to a still
higher degree in Poland. The trade unions of different towns seek
contact with one another and conferences are held. The end of the
“constitution period,” and the return to reaction in December 1905 put a
stop for the time being to the open widespread activity of the trade
unions, but did not, however, altogether extinguish them. They operate
as organisations in secret and occasionally carry on quite open wage
struggles. A peculiar mixture of the legal and illegal condition of
trade-union life is being built up, corresponding to the highly
contradictory revolutionary situation.

But in the midst of the struggle the work of organisation is being more
widely extended, in a thoroughgoing, not to say pedantic fashion. The
trade-unions of the social democracy of Poland and Lithuania, for
example, which at the last congress (in July 1906) were represented by
five delegates from a membership of 10,000 are furnished with the usual
statutes, printed membership cards, adhesive stamps, etc. And the same
bankers and shoemakers, engineers and printers of Warsaw and Lodz who in
June 1905 stood on the barricades and in December only awaited the word
from Petersburg to begin street fighting, find time and are eager,
between one mass strike and another, between prison and lockout, and
under the conditions of a siege, to go into their trade-union statutes
and discuss them earnestly. These barricade fighters of yesterday and
tomorrow have indeed more than once at meetings severely reprimanded
their leaders and threatened them with withdrawal from the party because
the unlucky trade-union membership cards could not be printed quickly
enough – in secret printing works under incessant police persecution.
This zeal and this earnestness continue to this day. For example, in the
first two weeks of July 1906 fifteen new trade unions appeared in
Ekaterinoslav, six in Kostroma, several in Kiev, Poltava, Smolensk,
Cherkassy, Proskurvo, down to the most insignificant provincial towns.

In the session of the Moscow trade-union council of June 4 this year,
after the acceptance of the reports of individual trade-union delegates,
it was decided “that the trade-unions should discipline their members
and restrain from street rioting because the time is not considered
opportune for the mass strike. In the face of possible provocation on
the part of the government, care should be taken that the masses do not
stream out in the streets.” Finally, the council decided that if at any
time one trade-union began a strike the others should hold back from any
wages movement. Most of the economic struggles are now directed by the
trade-unions.

Thus the great economic struggle which proceeded from the January
general strike, and which has not ceased to the present day, has formed
a broad background of the revolution from which, in ceaseless reciprocal
action with the political agitation and the external events of the
revolution, there ever arise here and there now isolated explosions, and
now great sections of the proletariat. Thus there flame up against this
background the following events one after the other; at the May Day
demonstration there was an unprecedented, absolute general strike in
Warsaw which ended in a bloody encounter between the defenceless crowd
and the soldiers. At Lodz in June a mass outing, which was scattered by
the soldiers, led to a demonstration of 100,000 workers at the funeral
of some of the victims of the brutal soldiery and to a renewed encounter
with the military, and finally, on June 23, 24 and 25, passed into the
first barricade fight in the czarist empire. Similarly in June the first
great revolt of the sailors of the Black Sea Fleet exploded in the
harbour of Odessa from a trifling incident on board the armoured vessel
_Potemkin_ which reacted immediately on Odessa and Nikolaev in the form
of a violent mass strike. As a further echo followed the mass strike and
the sailors’ revolts in Kronstadt, Libau and Vladivostok.

In the month of October the grandiose experiment of St. Petersburg was
made with the introduction of the eight-hour day. The general council of
workers delegates decided to achieve the eight-hour day in a
revolutionary manner. That means that on the appointed day all the
workers of Petersburg should inform their employers that they are not
willing to work more than eight hours a day, and should leave their
places of work at the end of eight hours. The idea was the occasion of
lively agitation, was accepted by the proletariat with enthusiasm and
carried out, but very great sacrifices were not thereby avoided. Thus
for example, the eight-hour day meant an enormous fall in wages for the
textile workers who had hitherto worked eleven hours and that on a
system of piecework. This, however, they willingly accepted. _Within a
week the eight-hour day prevailed in every factory and workshop in
Petersburg_, and the joy of the workers knew no bounds. Soon, however,
the employers, stupefied at first, prepared their defences; everywhere
they threatened to close their factories. Some of the workers consented
to negotiate and obtained here a working day of ten hours and there one
of nine hours. The elite of the Petersburg proletariat, however, the
workers in the large government engineering establishments, remained
unshaken, and a lockout ensued which threw from forty-five to fifty
thousand men on the streets for a month. At the settlement the
eight-hour day movement was carried into the general strike of December
which the great lockout had hampered to a great extent.

Meanwhile, however, the second tremendous general strike throughout the
whole empire follows in October as a reply to the project of the Bulygin
Duma – the strike to which the railwaymen gave the summons. This second
great action of the proletariat already bears a character essentially
different from that of the first one in January. The element of
political consciousness already plays a much bigger role. Here also, to
be sure, the immediate occasion for the outbreak of the mass strike was
a subordinate and apparently accidental thing: the conflict of the
railwaymen with the management over the pension fund. But the general
rising of the industrial proletariat which followed upon it was
conducted in accordance with clear political ideas. The prologue of the
January strike was a procession to the czar to ask for political
freedom: the watchword of the October strike ran away with the
constitutional comedy of czarism!

And thanks to the immediate success of the general strike, to the czar’s
manifesto of October 30, the movement does not flow back on itself, as
in January but rushes over outwardly in the eager activity of newly
acquired political freedom. Demonstrations, meetings, a young press,
public discussions and bloody massacres as the end of the story, and
thereupon new mass strikes and demonstrations – such is the stormy
picture of the November and December days. In November, at the instance
of the social democrats in Petersburg the first demonstrative mass
strike is arranged as a protest demonstration against the bloody deeds
and proclamation of a state of siege in Poland and Livonia.

The fermentation after the brief constitutional period and the gruesome
awakening finally leads in December to the outbreak of the third general
mass strike throughout the empire. This time its course and its outcome
are altogether different from those in the two earlier cases. Political
action does not change into economic action as in January, but it no
longer achieves a rapid victory as in October. The attempts of the
czarist camarilla with real political freedom are no longer made, and
revolutionary action therewith, for the first time, and along its whole
length, knocked against the strong wall of the physical violence of
absolutism. By the logical internal development of progressive
experience the mass strike this time changes into an open insurrection,
to armed barricades, and street fighting in Moscow. The December days in
Moscow close the first eventful year of the revolution as the highest
point in the ascending line of political action and of the mass strike
movement.

The Moscow events show a typical picture of the logical development and
at the same time of the future of the revolutionary movement on the
whole: their inevitable close in a general open insurrection, which
again on its part cannot come in any other way than through the school
of a series of preparatory partial insurrections, which end in partial
outward “defeats” and, considered individually, may appear to be
“premature.”

The year 1906 brings the elections to the Duma and the Duma incidents.
The proletariat, from a strong revolutionary instinct and clear
knowledge of the situation, boycotts the whole czarist constitutional
farce, and liberalism again occupies the centre stage for a few months.
The situation of 1904 appears to have come again, a period of speeches
instead of acts, and the proletariat for a time walk in the shadow in
order to devote themselves the more diligently to the trade-union
struggle and the work of the organisation. The mass strikes are no
longer spoken of, while the clattering rockets of liberal rhetoric are
fired off day after day. At last, the iron curtain is torn down, the
actors are dispersed, and nothing remains of the liberal rockets but
smoke and vapour. An attempt of the Central Committee of the Russian
social democracy to call forth a mass strike, as a demonstration for the
Duma and the reopening of the period of liberal speechmaking, falls
absolutely flat. The role of the political mass strike alone is
exhausted, but, at the same time, the transition of the mass strike into
a general popular rising is not yet accomplished. The liberal episode is
past, the proletarian episode is not yet begun. The stage remains empty
for the time being.



IV. THE INTERACTION OF THE POLITICAL AND THE ECONOMIC STRUGGLE


 

We have attempted in the foregoing to sketch the history of the mass
strike in Russia in a few strokes. Even a fleeting glance at this
history shows us a picture which in no way resembles that usually formed
by discussions in Germany on the mass strike. Instead of the rigid and
hollow scheme of an arid political action carried out by the decision of
the highest committees and furnished with a plan and panorama, we see a
bit of pulsating life of flesh and blood, which cannot be cut out of the
large frame of the revolution but is connected with all parts of the
revolution by a thousand veins.

The mass strike, as the Russian Revolution shows it to us, is such a
changeable phenomenon that it reflects all the phases of the political
and economic struggle, all stages and factors of the revolution. Its
adaptability, its efficiency, the factors of its origin are constantly
changing. It suddenly opens new and wide perspectives of the revolution
when it appears to have already arrived in a narrow pass and where it is
impossible for anyone to reckon upon it with any degree of certainty. It
flows now like a broad billow over the whole kingdom, and now divides
into a gigantic network of narrow streams; now it bubbles forth from
under the ground like a fresh spring and now is completely lost under
the earth. Political and economic strikes, mass strikes and partial
strikes, demonstrative strikes and fighting strikes, general strikes of
individual branches of industry and general strikes in individual towns,
peaceful wage struggles and street massacres, barricade fighting – all
these run through one another, run side by side, cross one another, flow
in and over one another – it is a ceaselessly moving, changing sea of
phenomena. And the law of motion of these phenomena is clear: it does
not lie in the mass strike itself nor in its technical details, but in
the political and social proportions of the forces of the revolution.

The mass strike is merely the form of the revolutionary struggle and
every disarrangement of the relations of the contending powers, in party
development and in class division, in the position of counter-revolution
– all this immediately influences the action of the strike in a thousand
invisible and scarcely controllable ways. But strike action itself does
not cease for a single moment. It merely alters its forms, its
dimensions, its effect. It is the living pulse-beat of the revolution
and at the same time its most powerful driving wheel. In a word, the
mass strike, as shown to us in the Russian Revolution, is not a crafty
method discovered by subtle reasoning for the purpose of making the
proletarian struggle more effective, _but the method of motion of the
proletarian mass_, the phenomenal form of the proletarian struggle in
the revolution.

Some general aspects may now be examined which may assist us in forming
a correct estimate of the problem of the mass strike:

1. It is absurd to think of the mass strike as one act, one isolated
action. The mass strike is rather the indication, the rallying idea, of
a whole period of the class struggle lasting for years, perhaps for
decades. Of the innumerable and highly varied mass strikes which have
taken place in Russia during the last four years, the scheme of the mass
strike was a purely political movement, begun and ended after a cut and
dried plan, a short single act of one variety only and, at that, a
subordinate variety – pure demonstration strike. In the whole course of
the five-year period we see in Russia only a few demonstration strikes,
which be it noted, were generally confined to single towns. Thus the
annual May Day general strike in Warsaw and Lodz in Russia proper on the
first of May has not yet been celebrated to any appreciable extent by
abstention from work; the mass strike in Warsaw on September 11, 1905,
as a memorial service in honour of the executed Martin Kasprzak; that of
November 1905 in Petersburg as protest demonstrations against the
declaration of the state of siege in Poland and Livonia; that of January
22, 1906 in Warsaw, Lodz, Czentochon and in Dombrowa coal basin, as well
as, in part, those in a few Russian towns as anniversary celebrations of
the Petersburg bloodbath; in addition, in July 1906 a general strike in
Tiflis as demonstration of sympathy with soldiers sentenced by
court-martial on account of the military revolt; and finally from the
same cause, in September 1906, during the deliberations of the
court-martial in Reval. All the above great and partial mass strikes and
general strikes were not demonstration strikes but fighting strikes, and
as such they originated, for the most part, spontaneously, in every case
from specific local accidental causes, without plan or design, and grew
with elemental power into great movements, and then they did not begin
an “orderly retreat,” but turned now into economic struggles, now into
street fighting, and now collapsed of themselves.

In this general picture the purely political demonstration strike plays
quite a subordinate role – isolated small points in the midst of a
mighty expanse. Thereby, temporarily considered, the following
characteristic discloses itself: the demonstration strikes which, in
contradistinction to the fighting strikes, exhibit the greatest mass of
party discipline, conscious direction and political thought, and
therefore must appear as the highest and most mature form of the mass
strike, play in reality the greatest part in the _beginnings_ of the
movement. Thus, for example, the absolute cessation of work on May 1,
1905, in Warsaw, as the first instance of a decision of the social
democrats carried throughout in such an astonishing fashion, was an
experience of great importance for the proletarian movement in Poland.
In the same way the sympathetic strike of the same year in Petersburg
made a great impression as the first experiment of conscious systematic
mass action in Russia. Similarly the “trial mass strike” of the Hamburg
comrades on January 17, 1906, will play a prominent part in the history
of the future German mass strike as the first vigorous attempt with the
much disputed weapon, and also a very successful and convincingly
striking test of the fighting temper and the lust for battle of the
Hamburg working class. And just as surely will the period of the mass
strike in Germany, when it has once begun in real earnest, lead of
itself to a real, general cessation of work on May first. The May Day
festival may naturally be raised to a position of honour as the first
great demonstration under the aegis of the mass struggle. In this sense
the “lame horse,” as the May Day festival was termed at the trade-union
congress at Cologne, has still a great future before it and an important
part to play, in the proletarian class struggle in Germany.

But with the development of the earnest revolutionary struggle the
importance of such demonstrations diminishes rapidly. It is precisely
those factors which objectively facilitate the realisation of the
demonstration strike after a preconceived plan and at the party’s word
of command – namely, the growth of political consciousness and the
training of the proletariat – make this kind of mass strike impossible;
today the proletariat in Russia, the most capable vanguard of the
masses, does not want to know about mass strikes; the workers are no
longer in a mood for jesting and will now think only of a serious
struggle with all its consequences. And when, in the first great mass
strike in January 1905, the demonstrative element, not indeed in an
intentional, but more in an instinctive, spontaneous form, still played
a great part, on the other hand, the attempt of the Central Committee of
the Russian social democrats to call a mass strike in August as a
demonstration for the dissolved Duma was shattered by, among other
things, the positive disinclination of the educated proletariat to
engage in weak half-actions and mere demonstrations.

2. When, however, we have in view the less important strike of the
demonstrative kind, instead of the fighting strike as it represents in
Russia today the actual vehicle of proletarian action, we see still more
clearly that it is impossible to separate the economic factors from one
another. Here also the reality deviates from the theoretical scheme, and
the pedantic representation in which the pure political mass strike is
logically derived from the trade-union general strike as the ripest and
highest stage, but at the same time is kept distinct from it, is shown
to be absolutely false. This is expressed not merely in the fact that
the mass strike from that first great wage struggle of the Petersburg
textile workers in 1896–97 to the last great mass strike in December
1905, passed imperceptibly from the economic field to the political, so
that it is almost impossible to draw a dividing line between them.

Again, every one of the great mass strikes repeats, so to speak, on a
small scale, the entire history of the Russian mass strike, and begins
with a pure economic, or at all events, a partial trade-union conflict,
and runs through all the stages to the political demonstration. The
great thunderstorm of mass strikes in South Russia in 1902 and 1903
originated, as we have seen, in Baku from a conflict arising from the
disciplinary punishment of the unemployed, in Rostov from disputes about
wages in the railway workshops, in Tiflis from a struggle of the
commercial employees for reduction of working hours, in Odessa from a
wage dispute in a single small factory. The January mass strike of 1905
developed from an internal conflict in the Putilov works, the October
strike from the struggle of the railway workers for a pension fund, and
finally the December strike from the struggle of the postal and
telegraph employees for the right of combination. The progress of the
movement on the whole is not expressed in the circumstances that the
economic initial stage is omitted, but much more in the rapidity with
which all the stages to the political demonstration are run through and
in the extremity of the point to which the strike moves forward.

But the movement on the whole does not proceed from the economic to the
political struggle, nor even the reverse. Every great political mass
action, after it has attained its political highest point, breaks up
into a mass of economic strikes. And that applies not only to each of
the great mass strikes, but also to the revolution as a whole. With the
spreading, clarifying and involution of the political struggle, the
economic struggle not only does not recede, but extends, organises and
becomes involved in equal measure. Between the two there is the most
complete reciprocal action.

Every new onset and every fresh victory of the political struggle is
transformed into a powerful impetus for the economic struggle, extending
at the same time its external possibilities and intensifying the inner
urge of the workers to better their position and their desire to
struggle. After every foaming wave of political action a fructifying
deposit remains behind from which a thousand stalks of economic struggle
shoot forth. And conversely. The workers’ condition of ceaseless
economic struggle with the capitalists keeps their fighting energy alive
in every political interval; it forms, so to speak, the permanent fresh
reservoir of the strength of the proletarian classes, from which the
political fight ever renews its strength, and at the same time leads the
indefatigable economic sappers of the proletariat at all times, now here
and now there, to isolated sharp conflicts, out of which public
conflicts on a large scale unexpectedly explode.

In a word: the economic struggle is the transmitter from one political
centre to another; the political struggle is the periodic fertilisation
of the soil for the economic struggle. Cause and effect here continually
change places; and thus the economic and the political factor in the
period of the mass strike, now widely removed, completely separated or
even mutually exclusive, as the theoretical plan would have them, merely
form the two interlacing sides of the proletarian class struggle in
Russia. And _their unity_ is precisely the mass strike. If the
sophisticated theory proposes to make a clever logical dissection of the
mass strike for the purpose of getting at the “purely political mass
strike,” it will by this dissection, as with any other, not perceive the
phenomenon in its living essence, but will kill it altogether.

3. Finally, the events in Russia show us that the mass strike is
inseparable from the revolution. The history of the Russian mass strike
is the history of the Russian Revolution. When, to be sure, the
representatives of our German opportunism hear of “revolution,” they
immediately think of bloodshed, street fighting or powder and shot, and
the logical conclusion thereof is: the mass strike leads inevitably to
the revolution, therefore we dare not have it. In actual fact we see in
Russia that almost every mass strike in the long run leads to an
encounter with the armed guardians of czarist order, and therein the
so-called political strikes exactly resemble the larger economic
struggle. The revolution, however, is something other and something more
than bloodshed. In contradiction to the police interpretation, which
views the revolution exclusively from the standpoint of street
disturbances and rioting, that is, from the standpoint of “disorder,”
the interpretation of scientific socialism sees in the revolution above
all a thorough-going internal reversal of social class relations. And
from this standpoint an altogether different connection exists between
revolution and mass strike in Russia from that contained in the
commonplace conception that the mass strike generally ends in bloodshed.

We have seen above the inner mechanism of the Russian mass strike which
depends upon the ceaseless reciprocal action of the political and
economic struggles. But this reciprocal action is conditioned during the
revolutionary period. Only in the sultry air of the period of revolution
can any partial little conflict between labour and capital grow into a
general explosion. In Germany the most violent, most brutal collisions
between the workers and employers take place every year and every day
without the struggle overleaping the bounds of the individual
departments or individual towns concerned, or even those of the
individual factories. Punishment of organised workers in Petersburg and
unemployment as in Baku, wage struggles as in Odessa, struggles for the
right of combination as in Moscow are the order of the day in Germany.
No single one of these cases however changes suddenly into a common
class action. And when they grow into isolated mass strikes, which have
without question a political colouring, they do not bring about a
general storm. The general strike of Dutch railwaymen, which died away
in spite of the warmest sympathy, in the midst of the complete
impassivity of the proletariat of the country, affords a striking proof
of this.

And conversely, only in the period of revolution, when the social
foundations and the walls of the class society are shaken and subjected
to a constant process of disarrangement, any political class action of
the proletariat can arouse from their passive condition in a few hours
whole sections of the working class who have hitherto remained
unaffected, and this is immediately and naturally expressed in a stormy
economic struggle. The worker, suddenly aroused to activity by the
electric shock of political action, immediately seizes the weapon lying
nearest his hand for the fight against his condition of economic
slavery: the stormy gesture of the political struggle causes him to feel
with unexpected intensity the weight and the pressure of his economic
chains. And while, for example, the most violent political struggle in
Germany – the electoral struggle or the parliamentary struggle on the
customs tariff – exercised a scarcely perceptible direct influence upon
the course and the intensity of the wage struggles being conducted at
the same time in Germany, every political action of the proletariat in
Russia immediately expresses itself in the extension of the area and the
deepening of the intensity of the economic struggle.

The revolution thus first creates the social conditions in which this
sudden change of the economic struggle into the political and of the
political struggle into the economic is possible, a change which finds
its expression in the mass strike. And if the vulgar scheme sees the
connection between mass strike and revolution only in bloody street
encounters with which the mass strikes conclude, a somewhat deeper look
into the Russian events shows an exactly opposite connection: in reality
the mass strike does not produce the revolution but the revolution
produces the mass strike.

4. It is sufficient in order to comprehend the foregoing to obtain an
explanation of the question of the conscious direction and initiative in
the mass strike. If the mass strike is not an isolated act but a whole
period of the class struggle, and if this period is identical with a
period of revolution, it is clear that the mass strike cannot be called
at will, even when the decision to do so may come from the highest
committee of the strongest social democratic party. As long as the
social democracy has not the power to stage and countermand revolutions
according to its fancy, even the greatest enthusiasm and impatience of
the social democratic troops will not suffice to call into being a real
period of mass strike as a living, powerful movement of the people. On
the basis of a decision of the party leadership and of party discipline,
a single short demonstration may well be arranged similar to the Swedish
mass strike, or to the latest Austrian strike, or even to the Hamburg
mass strike of January 17. These demonstrations, however, differ from an
actual period of revolutionary mass strikes in exactly the same way that
the well-known demonstrations in foreign ports during a period of
strained diplomatic relations differ from a naval war. A mass strike
born of pure discipline and enthusiasm will, at best, merely play the
role of an episode, of a symptom of the fighting mood of the working
class upon which, however, the conditions of a peaceful period are
reflected.

Of course, even during the revolution, mass strikes do not exactly fall
from heaven. They must be brought about in some way or another by the
workers. The resolution and determination of the workers also play a
part and indeed the initiative and the wider direction naturally fall to
the share of the organised and most enlightened kernel of the
proletariat. But the scope of this initiative and this direction, for
the most part, is confined to application to individual acts, to
individual strikes, when the revolutionary period is already begun, and
indeed, in most cases, is confined within the boundaries of a single
town. Thus, for example, as we have seen, the social democrats have
already, on several occasions, successfully issued a direct summons for
a mass strike in Baku, in Warsaw, in Lodz, and in Petersburg. But this
succeeds much less frequently when applied to general movements of the
whole proletariat.

Further, there are quite definite limits set to initiative and conscious
direction. During the revolution it is extremely difficult for any
directing organ of the proletarian movement to foresee and to calculate
which occasions and factors can lead to explosions and which cannot.
Here also initiative and direction do not consist in issuing commands
according to one’s inclinations, but in the most adroit adaptability to
the given situation, and the closest possible contact with the mood of
the masses. The element of spontaneity, as we have seen, plays a great
part in all Russian mass strikes without exception, be it as a driving
force or as a restraining influence. This does not occur in Russia,
however, because social democracy is still young or weak, but because in
every individual act of the struggle so very many important economic,
political and social, general and local, material and psychical, factors
react upon one another in such a way that no single act can be arranged
and resolved as if it were a mathematical problem. The revolution, even
when the proletariat, with the social democrats at their head, appear in
the leading role, is not a manoeuvre of the proletariat in the open
field, but a fight in the midst of the incessant crashing, displacing
and crumbling of the social foundation. In short, in the mass strikes in
Russia the element of spontaneity plays such a predominant part, not
because the Russian proletariat are “uneducated,” but because
revolutions do not allow anyone to play the schoolmaster with them.

On the other hand, we see in Russia that the same revolution which
rendered the social democrats’ command of the mass strike so difficult,
and which struck the conductor’s baton from, or pressed into, their hand
at all times in such a comical fashion – we see that it resolved of
itself all those difficulties of the mass strike which, in the
theoretical scheme of German discussion are regarded as the chief
concern of the “directing body”: the question of “provisioning,”
“discovery of cost,” and “sacrifice.” It goes without saying that it
does not resolve them in the way that they would be resolved in a quiet
confidential discussion between the higher directing committees of the
labour movement, the members sitting pencil in hand. The “regulation” of
all these questions consists in the circumstance that the revolution
brings such an enormous mass of people upon the stage that any
computation or regulation of the cost of the movement such as can be
effected in a civil process, appears to be an altogether hopeless
undertaking.

The leading organisations in Russia certainly attempt to support the
direct victims to the best of their ability. Thus, for example, the
brave victims of the gigantic lockout in St. Petersburg, which followed
upon the eight-hour day campaign, were supported for weeks. But all
these measures are, in the enormous balance of the revolution, but as a
drop in the ocean. At the moment that a real, earnest period of mass
strikes begins, all these “calculations” of “cost” become merely
projects for exhausting the ocean with a tumbler. And it is a veritable
ocean of frightful privations and sufferings which is brought by every
revolution to the proletarian masses. And the solution which a
revolutionary period makes of this apparently invincible difficulty
consists in the circumstances that such an immense volume of mass
idealism is simultaneously released that the masses are insensible to
the bitterest sufferings. With the psychology of a trade unionist who
will not stay off his work on May Day unless he is assured in advance of
a definite amount of support in the event of his being victimised,
neither revolution nor mass strike can be made. But in the storm of the
revolutionary period even the proletarian is transformed from a
provident pater familas demanding support, into a “revolutionary
romanticist,” for whom even the highest good, life itself, to say
nothing of material well-being, possesses but little in comparison with
the ideals of the struggle.

If, however, the direction of the mass strike in the sense of command
over its origin, and in the sense of the calculating and reckoning of
the cost, is a matter of the revolutionary period itself, the directing
of the mass strike becomes, in an altogether different sense, the duty
of social democracy and its leading organs. Instead of puzzling their
heads with the technical side, with the mechanism, of the mass strike,
the social democrats are called upon to assume _political_ leadership in
the midst of the revolutionary period.

To give the cue for, and the direction to, the fight; to so regulate the
tactics of the political struggle in its every phase and at its every
moment that the entire sum of the available power of the proletariat
which is already released and active, will find expression in the battle
array of the party; to see that the tactics of the social democrats are
decided according to their resoluteness and acuteness and that they
never fall below the level demanded by the actual relations of forces,
but rather rise above it – that is the most important task of the
directing body in a period of mass strikes. And this direction changes
of itself, to a certain extent, into technical direction. A consistent,
resolute, progressive tactic on the part of the social democrats
produces in the masses a feeling of security, self-confidence and desire
for struggle; a vacillating weak tactic, based on an underestimation of
the proletariat, has a crippling and confusing effect upon the masses.
In the first case mass strikes break out “of themselves” and
“opportunely”; in the second case they remain ineffective amidst direct
summonses of the directing body to mass strikes. And of both the Russian
Revolution affords striking examples.



V. LESSONS OF THE WORKING-CLASS MOVEMENT IN RUSSIA APPLICABLE TO GERMANY


 

Let us now see how far all these lessons which can be learned from the
Russian mass strikes are applicable to Germany. The social and political
conditions, the history and status of the labour movement are widely
different in Germany and Russia. At first sight the inner law of the
Russian mass strikes as sketched above may appear to be solely the
product of specifically Russian conditions which need not be taken into
account by the German proletariat. Between the political and economic
struggle in the Russian Revolution there is a very close internal
connection; their unity becomes an actual fact in the period of mass
strikes. But is not that simply a result of Russian absolutism? In a
state in which every form and expression of the labour movement is
forbidden, in which the simplest strike is a political crime, it must
logically follow that every economic struggle will become a political
one.

Further, when, contrariwise, the first outbreak of the political
revolution has drawn after it a general reckoning of the Russian working
class with the employers, that is likewise a simple result of the
circumstances that the Russian worker has hitherto had a very low
standard of life, and has never yet engaged in a single economic
struggle for an improvement of his condition. The proletariat in Russia
has first, to a certain extent, to work their way out of these miserable
conditions, and what wonder that they eagerly availed themselves, with
the eagerness of youth, of the first means to that end as soon as the
revolution brought the first fresh breeze into the heavy air of
absolutism?

And finally, the stormy revolutionary course of the Russian mass strikes
as well as their preponderant spontaneous, elementary character is
explained on the one hand by the political backwardness of Russia, by
the necessity of first overthrowing the oriental despotism, and on the
other hand, by the want of organisation and of discipline of the Russian
proletariat. In a country in which the working-class has had thirty
years experience of political life, a strong social democratic party of
three million members and a quarter of a million picked troops organised
in trade unions, neither the political struggle nor the mass strike can
possibly assume the same stormy and elemental character as in a
semi-barbarous state which has just made the leap from the Middle Ages
into the modern bourgeois order. This is the current conception amongst
those who would read the stage of maturity of the social conditions of a
country from the text of the written laws.

Let us examine the questions in their order. To begin with it is going
the wrong way about the matter to date the beginning of the economic
struggle in Russia only from the outbreak of the revolution. As a matter
of fact, the strikes and wage disputes in Russia proper were
increasingly the order of the day since the nineties of the last
century, and in Russian Poland even since the eighties, and had
eventually won civic rights for the workers. Of course, they were
frequently followed by brutal police measures, but nevertheless they
were daily phenomena. For example, in both Warsaw and Lodz as early as
1891, there was a considerable strike fund, and the enthusiasm for trade
unionism in these years had even created that “economic” illusion in
Poland for a short time which a few years later prevailed in Petersburg
and the rest of Russia.

In the same way there is a great deal of exaggeration in the notion that
the proletarian in the czarist empire had the standard of life of a
pauper before the revolution. The layer of the workers in large
industries in the great towns who had been the most active and jealous
in the economic as in the political struggle are, as regards the
material conditions of life, on a scarcely lower plane than the
corresponding layer of the German proletariat, and in some occupations
as high wages are to be met with in Russia as in Germany, and here and
there, even higher. And as regards the length of the working day, the
difference in the large-scale industries in the two countries is here
and there, insignificant. The notion of the presumed material and
cultural condition of helotry of the Russian working-class is similarly
without justification in fact. This notion is contradicted, as a little
reflection will show, by the facts of the revolution itself and the
prominent part that was played therein by the proletariat. With paupers
no revolution of this political maturity and cleverness of thought can
be made, and the industrial workers of St. Petersburg and Warsaw, Moscow
and Odessa, who stand in the forefront of the struggle, are culturally
and mentally much nearer to the west European type than is imagined by
those who regard bourgeois parliamentarism and methodical trade-union
practice as the indispensable, or even the only, school of culture for
the proletariat. The modern large capitalist development of Russia and
the intellectual influence of social democracy exerted for a
decade-and-a-half, which has encouraged and directed the economic
struggle, have accomplished an important piece of cultural work without
the outward guarantees of the bourgeois legal order.

The contrast, however, grows less when, on the other hand, we look a
little further into the actual standard of life in the German
working-class. The great political mass strikes in Russia have, from the
first, aroused the widest layers of the proletariat and thrown them into
a feverish economic struggle. But are there not in Germany whole
unenlightened sections amongst the workers to which the warm light of
the trade unions has hitherto scarcely penetrated, whole layers which up
to the present have never attempted, or vainly attempted, to raise
themselves out of their social helotry by means of daily wage struggles?

Let us consider _the poverty of the miners_. Already in the quiet
working day, in the cold atmosphere of the parliamentary monotony of
Germany – as also in other countries, and even in the El Dorado of trade
unionism, Great Britain – the wage struggle of the mine workers hardly
ever expresses itself in any other way than by violent eruptions from
time-to-time in mass strikes of typical, elemental character. This only
shows that the antagonism between labour and capital is too sharp and
violent to allow of its crumbling away in the form of quiet systematic,
partial trade-union struggles. The misery of the miners, with its
eruptive soil which even in “normal” times is a storm centre of the
greatest violence, must immediately explode, in a violent economic
socialist struggle, with every great political mass action of the
working class, with every violent sudden jerk which disturbs the
momentary equilibrium of everyday social life.

Let us take further, the case of the _poverty of the textile workers_.
Here also the bitter, and for the most part fruitless, outbreaks of the
wage struggle which raged through Vogtland every few years, give but a
faint idea of the vehemence with which the great agglomerate mass of
helots of trustified textile capital must explode during a political
convulsion, during a powerful, daring mass action of the German
proletariat. Again, let us take the _poverty of the home-workers, of the
ready-made clothing workers, of the electricity workers_, veritable
storm centres in which violent struggles will be the more certain to
break out with every political atmospheric disturbance in Germany, the
less frequently the proletariat take up the struggle in tranquil times;
and the more unsuccessfully they fight at any time, the more brutally
will capital comply them to return, gnashing their teeth, to the yoke of
slavery.

Now, however, whole great categories of the proletariat have to be taken
into account which, in the “normal” course of things in Germany, cannot
possibly take part in a peaceful economic struggle for the improvement
of their condition and cannot possibly avail themselves of the right of
combination. First and foremost we give the example of the glaring
poverty of the _railway and the postal employees_. For these government
workers there exist Russian conditions in the midst of the parliamentary
constitutional state of Germany, that is to say, Russian conditions as
they existed only before the revolution, during the untroubled splendour
of absolutism. Already in the great October strike of 1905 the Russian
railwaymen in the then formally absolutist Russia, were, as regards the
economic and social freedom of their movement, head and shoulders above
the Germans. The Russian railway and postal employees won the de facto
right of combination in the storm, and if momentarily trial upon trial
and victimisation were the rule, they were powerless to affect the inner
unity of workers.

However, it would be an altogether false psychological reckoning if one
were to assume, with the German reaction, that the slavish obedience of
the German railway and postal employees will last forever, that it is a
rock which nothing can wear away. When even the German trade-union
leaders have become accustomed to the existing conditions to such an
extent that they, untroubled by an indifference almost without parallel
in the whole of Europe, can survey with complete satisfaction the
results of the trade-union struggle in Germany, then the deep-seated,
long-suppressed resentment of the uniformed state slaves will inevitably
find vent with a general rising of the industrial workers And when the
industrial vanguard of the proletariat, by means of mass strikes, grasp
at new political rights or attempt to defend existing ones, the great
army of railway and postal employees must of necessity bethink
themselves of their own special disgrace, and at last rouse themselves
for their liberation from the extra share of Russian absolutism which is
specially reserved for them in Germany.

The pedantic conception which would unfold great popular movements
according to plan and recipe regards the acquisition of the right of
combination for the railway workers as necessary before anyone will
“dare to think” of a mass strike in Germany. The actual and natural
course of events can only be the opposite of this: only from a
spontaneous powerful mass strike action can the right of combination for
the German railway workers, as well as for the postal employees,
actually be born. And the problems which in the existing conditions of
Germany are insoluble will suddenly find their solution under the
influence and the pressure of a universal political mass action of the
proletariat.

And finally, the greatest and most important: _the poverty of the land
workers_. If the British trade-unions are composed exclusively of
industrial workers, that is quite understandable in view of the special
character of the British national economy, and of the unimportant part
that agriculture plays, on the whole, in the economic life of Britain.
In Germany, a trade-union organisation, be it ever so well constructed,
if it comprises only industrial workers, and is inaccessible to the
great army of land workers, will give only a weak, partial picture of
the conditions of the proletariat. But again it would be a fatal
illusion to think that conditions in the country are unalterable and
immovable and that the indefatigable educational work of the social
democracy, and still more, the whole internal class politics of Germany,
does not continually undermine the outward passivity of the agricultural
workers and that any great general class action of the German
proletariat, for whatever object undertaken, may not also draw the rural
proletariat into the conflict.

Similarly, the picture of the alleged economic superiority of the German
over the Russian proletariat is considerably altered when we look away
from the tables of the industries and departments organised in
trade-unions and bestow a look upon those great groups of the
proletariat who are altogether outside the trade-union struggle, or
whose special economic condition does not allow of their being forced
into the narrow framework of the daily guerrilla warfare of the
trade-unions. We see there one important sphere after another, in which
the sharpening of antagonisms has reached the extreme point, in which
inflammable material in abundance is heaped up, in which there is a
great deal of “Russian absolutism” in its most naked form, and in which
economically the most elementary reckonings with capital have first to
be made.

In a general political mass strike of the proletariat, then, all these
outstanding accounts would inevitably be presented to the prevailing
system. An artificially arranged demonstration of the urban proletariat,
taking place once, a mere mass strike action arising out of discipline,
and directed by the conductor’s baton of a party executive, could
therefore leave the broad masses of the people cold and indifferent. But
a powerful and reckless fighting action of the industrial proletariat,
born of a revolutionary situation, must surely react upon the
deeper-lying layers, and ultimately draw all those into a stormy general
economic struggle who, in normal times, stand aside from the daily
trade-union fight.

But when we come back to the organised vanguard of the German industrial
proletariat, on the other hand, and keep before our eyes the objects of
the economic struggle which have been striven for by the Russian working
class, we do not at all find that there is any tendency to look down
upon the things of youth, as the oldest German trade-unions had reason
to do. Thus the most important general demand of the Russian strikes
since January 22 – the eight-hour day – is certainly not an unattainable
platform for the German proletariat, but rather in most cases, a
beautiful, remote ideal. This applies also to the struggle for the
“mastery of the household” platform, to the struggle for the
introduction of workers’ committees into all the factories, for the
abolition of piece-work, for the abolition of homework in handicraft,
for the complete observance of Sunday rest, and for the recognition of
the right of combination. Yes, on closer inspection all the economic
objects of struggle of the Russian proletariat are also for the German
proletariat very real, and touch a very sore spot in the life of the
workers.

It therefore inevitably follows that the pure political mass strike,
which is operated with for preference, is, in Germany, a mere lifeless
theoretical plan. If the mass strikes result, in a natural way from a
strong revolutionary ferment, they will equally naturally, exactly as in
Russia, change into a whole period of elementary, economic struggles.
The fears of the trade-union leaders, therefore, that the struggle for
economic interests in a period of stormy political strife, in a period
of mass strikes, can simply be pushed aside and suppressed rest upon an
utterly baseless, schoolboy conception of the course of events. A
revolutionary period in Germany would also so alter the character of the
trade-union struggle and develop its potentialities to such an extent
that the present guerrilla warfare of the trade-unions would be child’s
play in comparison. And on the other hand, from this elementary economic
tempest of mass strikes, the political struggle would always derive new
impetus and fresh strength. The reciprocal action of economic and
political struggle, which is the main-spring of present-day strikes in
Russia, and at the same time the regulating mechanism of the
revolutionary action of the proletariat, would also naturally result in
Germany from the conditions themselves.



VI. CO-OPERATION OF ORGANISED AND UNORGANISED WORKERS NECESSARY FOR VICTORY


 

In connection with this, the question of organisation in relation to the
problem of the mass strike in Germany assumes an essentially different
aspect.

The attitude of many trade-union leaders to this question is generally
summed up in the assertion: “We are not yet strong enough to risk such a
hazardous trial of strength as a mass strike.” Now this position is so
far untenable that it is an insoluble problem to determine the time, in
a peaceful fashion by counting heads, when the proletariat are “strong
enough” for any struggle. Thirty years ago the German trade-unions had
50,000 members. That was obviously a number with which a mass strike on
the above scale was not to be thought of. Fifteen years later the
trade-unions were four times as strong, and counted 237,000 members. If,
however, the present trade-union leaders had been asked at the time if
the organisation of the proletariat was then sufficiently ripe for a
mass strike, they would assuredly have replied that it was still far
from it and that the number of those organised in trade-unions would
first have to be counted by millions.

Today the number of trade-unionists already runs into the second
million, but the views of the leaders are still exactly the same, and
may very well be the same to the end. The tacit assumption is that the
entire working class of Germany, down to the last man and the last
woman, must be included in the organisation before it “is strong enough”
to risk a mass action, which then, according to the old formula, would
probably be represented as “superfluous.” This theory is nevertheless
absolutely utopian, for the simple reason that it suffers from an
internal contradiction, that it goes in a vicious circle. Before the
workers can engage in any direct class struggle they must all be
organised. The circumstances, the conditions, of capitalist development
and of the bourgeois state make it impossible that, in the normal course
of things, without stormy class struggles, certain sections – and these
the greatest, the most important, the lowest and the most oppressed by
capital, and by the state – can be organised at all. We see even in
Britain, which has had a whole century of indefatigable trade-union
effort without any “disturbances” – except at the beginning in the
period of the Chartist movement – without any “romantic revolutionary”
errors or temptations, it has not been possible to do more than organise
a minority of the better-paid sections of the proletariat.

On the other hand the trade-unions, like all fighting organisations of
the proletariat, cannot permanently maintain themselves in any other way
than by struggle, and that not struggles of the same kind as the war
between the frogs and the mice in the stagnant waters of the bourgeois
parliamentary period, but struggle in the troubled revolutionary periods
of the mass strike. The rigid, mechanical-bureaucratic conception cannot
conceive of the struggle save as the product of organisation at a
certain stage of its strength. On the contrary, the living, dialectical
explanation makes the organisation arise as a product of the struggle.
We have already seen a grandiose example of this phenomenon in Russia,
where a proletariat almost wholly unorganised created a comprehensive
network of organisational appendages in a year-and-a-half of stormy
revolutionary struggle.

Another example of this kind is furnished by the history of the German
unions. In the year 1878 the number of trade-union members amounted to
50,000. According to the theory of the present-day trade-union leaders
this organisation, as stated above, was not nearly “strong enough” to
enter upon a violent political struggle. The German trade-unions
however, weak as they were at the time, did take up the struggle –
namely the struggle against the anti-socialist law – and showed that
they were “strong enough,” not only to emerge victorious from the
struggle, but to increase their strength five-fold: in 1891, after the
repeal of the anti-socialist laws, their membership was 277,659. It is
true that the methods by which the trade-unions conquered in the
struggle against the anti-socialist laws do not correspond to the ideal
of a peaceful, bee-like, uninterrupted process: they went first into the
fight absolutely in ruins, to rise again on the next wave and to be born
anew. But this is precisely the specific method of growth corresponding
to the proletarian class organisations: to be tested in the struggle and
to go forth from the struggle with increased strength.

On a closer examination of German conditions and of the condition of the
different sections of the working class, it is clear that the coming
period of stormy political mass struggles will not bring the dreaded,
threatening downfall of the German trade-unions, but on the contrary,
will open up hitherto unsuspected prospects of the extension of their
sphere of power – an extension that will proceed rapidly by leaps and
bounds. But the question has still another aspect. The plan of
undertaking mass strikes as a serious political class action with
organised workers only is absolutely hopeless. If the mass strike, or
rather, mass strikes, and the mass struggle are to be successful they
must become a real _people’s movement_, that is, the widest sections of
the proletariat must be drawn into the fight. Already in the
parliamentary form the might of the proletarian class struggle rests not
on the small, organised group but on the surrounding periphery of the
revolutionary-minded proletariat. If the social democrats were to enter
the electoral battle with their few hundred thousand organised members
alone, they would condemn themselves to futility. And although it is the
tendency of social democracy wherever possible to draw the whole great
army of its voters into the party organisation, its mass of voters after
thirty years experience of social democracy is not increased through the
growth of the party organisation, but on the contrary, the new sections
of the proletariat, won for the time being through the electoral
struggle, are the fertile soil for the subsequent seed of organisation.
Here the organisation does not supply the troops of the struggle, but
the struggle, in an ever growing degree, supplies recruits for the
organisation.

In a much greater degree does this obviously apply to direct political
mass action than to the parliamentary struggle. If the social democrats,
as the organised nucleus of the working class, are the most important
vanguard of the entire body of the workers and if the political clarity,
the strength, and the unity of the labour movement flow from this
organisation, then it is not permissible to visualise the class movement
of the proletariat as a movement of the organised minority. Every real,
great class struggle must rest upon the support and co-operation of the
widest masses, and a strategy of class struggle which does not reckon
with this co-operation, which is based upon the idea of the finely
stage-managed march out of the small, well-trained part of the
proletariat is foredoomed to be a miserable fiasco.

Mass strikes and political mass struggles cannot, therefore, possibly be
carried through in Germany by the organised workers alone, nor can they
be appraised by regular “direction” from the central committee of a
party. In this case, again – exactly as in Russia – they depend not so
much upon “discipline” and “training” and upon the most careful possible
regulation beforehand of the questions of support and cost, as upon a
real revolutionary, determined class action, which will be able to win
and draw into the struggle the widest circles of the unorganised
workers, according to their mood and their conditions.

The overestimate and the false estimate of the role of organisations in
the class struggle of the proletariat is generally reinforced by the
underestimate of the unorganised proletarian mass and of their political
maturity. In a revolutionary period, in the storm of great unsettling
class struggles, the whole educational effect of the rapid capitalist
development and of social democratic influences first shows itself upon
the widest sections of the people, of which, in peaceful times the
tables of the organised, and even election statistics, give only a faint
idea.

We have seen that in Russia, in about two years a great general action
of the proletariat can forthwith arise from the smallest partial
conflict of the workers with the employers, from the most insignificant
act of brutality of the government organs. Everyone, of course, sees and
believes that, because in Russia “the revolution” is there. But what
does that mean? It means that class feeling, the class instinct, is
alive and very active in the Russian proletariat, so that immediately
they regard every partial question of any small group of workers as a
general question, as a class affair, and quick as lightening they react
to its influence as a unity. While in Germany, France, Italy and Holland
the most violent trade-union conflicts call forth hardly any general
action of the working class – and when they do, only the organised part
of the workers move – in Russia the smallest dispute raises a storm.
That means nothing else however, than that at present – paradoxical as
it may sound – the class instinct of the youngest, least trained, badly
educated and still worse organised Russian proletariat is immeasurably
stronger than that of the organised, trained and enlightened working
class of Germany or of any other west European country. And that is not
to be reckoned a special virtue of the “young, unexhausted East” as
compared with the “sluggish West,” but is simply a result of direct
revolutionary mass action.

In the case of the enlightened German worker the class consciousness
implanted by the social democrats is _theoretical and latent_: in the
period ruled by bourgeois parliamentarism it cannot, as a rule, actively
participate in a direct mass action; it is the ideal sum of the four
hundred parallel actions of the electoral sphere during the election
struggle, of the many partial economic strikes and the like. In the
revolution when the masses themselves appear upon the political
battlefield this class-consciousness becomes _practical and active_. A
year of revolution has therefore given the Russian proletariat that
“training” which thirty years of parliamentary and trade-union struggle
cannot artificially give to the German proletariat. Of course, this
living, active class feeling of the proletariat will considerably
diminish in intensity, or rather change into a concealed and latent
condition, after the close of the period of revolution and the erection
of a bourgeois-parliamentary constitutional state.

And just as surely, on the other hand, will the living revolutionary
class feeling, capable of action, affect the widest and deepest layers
of the proletariat in Germany in a period of strong political
engagement, and that the more rapidly and more deeply, more
energetically the educational work of social democracy is carried on
amongst them. This educational work and the provocative and
revolutionising effect of the whole present policy of Germany will
express itself in the circumstances that all those groups which at
present in their apparent political stupidity remain insensitive to all
the organising attempts of the social democrats and of the trade unions
will suddenly follow the flag of social democracy in a serious
revolutionary period. Six months of a revolutionary period will complete
the work of the training of these as yet unorganised masses which ten
years of public demonstrations and distribution of leaflets would be
unable to do. And when conditions in Germany have reached the critical
stage for such a period, the sections which are today unorganised and
backward will, in the struggle, prove themselves the most radical, the
most impetuous element, and not one that will have to be dragged along.
If it should come to mass strikes in Germany it will almost certainly
not be the best organised workers – and most certainly not the printers
– who will develop the greatest capacity for action, but the worst
organised or totally unorganised – the miners, the textile workers, and
perhaps even the land workers.

In this way we arrive at the same conclusions in Germany in relation to
the peculiar tasks of _direction_ in relation to the role of social
democracy in mass strikes, as in our analysis of events in Russia. If we
now leave the pedantic scheme of demonstrative mass strikes artificially
brought about by order of parties and trade unions, and turn to the
living picture of a peoples’ movement arising with elementary energy,
from the culmination of class antagonisms and the political situation –
a movement which passes, politically as well as economically, into mass
struggles and mass strikes – it becomes obvious that the task of social
democracy does not consist in the technical preparation and direction of
mass strikes, but, first and foremost, in the _political leadership_ of
the whole movement.

The social democrats are the most enlightened, most class-conscious
vanguard of the proletariat. They cannot and dare not wait, in a
fatalist fashion, with folded arms for the advent of the “revolutionary
situation,” to wait for that which in every spontaneous peoples’
movement, falls from the clouds. On the contrary, they must now, as
always, hasten the development of things and endeavour to accelerate
events. This they cannot do, however, by suddenly issuing the “slogan”
for a mass strike at random at any odd moment, but first and foremost,
by making clear to the widest layers of the proletariat the _inevitable
advent_ of this revolutionary period, the inner _social factors_ making
for it and the _political consequences_ of it. If the widest proletarian
layer should be won for a political mass action of the social democrats,
and if, vice versa, the social democrats should seize and maintain the
real leadership of a mass movement – should they become, in a _political
sense_, the rulers of the whole movement, then they must, with the
utmost clearness, consistency and resoluteness, inform the German
proletariat of their tactics and aims in the period of coming struggle.



VII. THE ROLE OF THE MASS STRIKE IN THE REVOLUTION


 

We have seen that the mass strike in Russia does not represent an
artificial product of premeditated tactics on the part of the social
democrats, but a natural historical phenomenon on the basis of the
present revolution. Now what are the factors which in Russia have
brought forth this new phenomenal form of the revolution?

The Russian revolution has for first task the abolition of absolutism
and the establishment of a modern bourgeois-parliamentary constitutional
state. It is exactly the same in form as that which confronted Germany
in the March 1848 Revolution, and the Great French Revolution of the end
of the eighteenth century. But the condition, the historical milieu, in
which these formally analogous revolutions took place, are fundamentally
different from those of present-day Russia. The essential difference is
that between those bourgeois revolutions in the West, and the current
bourgeois revolution in the East, the whole cycle of capitalist
development has run its course. And this development had seized not only
the West European countries, but also absolutist Russia. Large-scale
industry with all its consequences – modern class divisions, acute
social contrasts, modern life in large cities and the modern proletariat
– has become in Russia the prevailing form, that is, in social
development the decisive form of production.

The remarkable, contradictory, historical situation results from this
that the bourgeois revolution, in accordance with its formal tasks will,
in the first place, be carried out by a modern class-conscious
proletariat, and in an international milieu whose distinguishing
characteristic is the ruin of bourgeois democracy. It is not the
bourgeoisie that is now the driving force of revolution as in the
earlier revolutions of the West, while the proletarian masses, swamped
amidst a petty-bourgeois mass, simply furnish cannon-fodder for the
bourgeoisie, but on the contrary, it is the class-conscious proletariat
that is the active and leading element, while the big bourgeois turns
out to be either openly against the revolution or liberal moderates, and
only the rural petit-bourgeoisie and the urban petit-bourgeois
intelligentsia are definitively oppositional and even revolutionary
minded.

The Russian proletariat, however, who are destined to play the leading
part in the bourgeois revolution, enter the fight free from all
illusions of bourgeois democracy, with a strongly developed
consciousness of their own specific class interests, and at a time when
the antagonism between capital and labour has reached its height. This
contradictory situation finds expression in the fact that in this
formally bourgeois revolution, the antagonism of bourgeois society to
absolutism is governed by the antagonism of the proletariat to bourgeois
society, that the struggle of the proletariat to bourgeois society is
directed simultaneously and with equal energy against both absolutism
and capitalist exploitation, and that the programme of the revolutionary
struggle concentrates with equal emphasis on political freedom, the
winning of the eight-hour day, and a human standard of material
existence for the proletariat. This two-fold character of the Russian
Revolution is expressed in that close union of the economic with the
political struggle and in their mutual interaction which we have seen is
a feature of the Russian events and which finds its appropriate
expression in the mass strike.

In the earlier bourgeois revolution where, on the one hand, the
political training and the leadership of the revolutionary masses were
undertaken by the bourgeois parties, and where, on the other hand, it
was merely a question of overthrowing the old government, the brief
battle at the barricades was the appropriate form of the revolutionary
struggle. Today the working class must educate itself, marshal its
forces, and direct itself in the course of the revolutionary struggle
and thus the revolution is directed as much against capitalist
exploitation as against the _ancien regime_; so much so that the mass
strike appears as the natural means to recruit, organize and prepare the
widest proletarian layers for revolutionary struggle, as the means to
undermine and overthrow the old state power, as well as to contain the
capitalist exploitation. The urban industrial proletariat is now the
soul of the revolution in Russia. But in order to carry through a direct
political struggle as a mass, the proletariat must first be assembled as
a mass, and for this purpose they must come out of the factory and
workshop, mine and foundry, must overcome the atomisation and decay to
which they are condemned under the daily yoke of capitalism.

The mass strike is the first natural, impulsive form of every great
revolutionary struggle of the proletariat and the more highly developed
the antagonism is between capital and labour, the more effective and
decisive must mass strikes become. The chief form of previous bourgeois
revolutions, the fight at the barricades, the open conflict with the
armed power of the state, is in the revolution today only the
culminating point, only a moment on the process of the proletarian mass
struggle. And therewith in the new form of the revolution there is
reached that civilising and mitigating of the class struggle which was
prophesied by the opportunists of German social democracy – the
Bernsteins, Davids, etc. It is true that these men saw the desired
civilising and mitigating of the class struggle in the light of petty
bourgeois democratic illusions – they believed that the class struggle
would shrink to an exclusively parliamentary contest and that street
fighting would simply be done away with. History has found the solution
in a deeper and finer fashion: in the advent of revolutionary mass
strikes, which, of course, in no way replaces brutal street fights or
renders them unnecessary, but which reduces them to a moment in the long
period of political struggle, and which at the same time unites with the
revolutionary period and enormous cultural work in the most exact sense
of the words: the material and intellectual elevation of the whole
working class through the “civilising” of the barbaric forms of
capitalist exploitation.

The mass strike is thus shown to be not a specifically Russian product,
springing from absolutism, but a universal form of the proletarian class
struggle resulting from the present stage of capitalist development and
class relations. From this standpoint the three bourgeois revolutions –
the Great French Revolution, the German Revolution of March, and the
present Russian Revolution – form a continuous chain of development in
which the fortunes and the end of the capitalist century are to be seen.
In the Great French Revolution the still wholly underdeveloped internal
contradictions of bourgeois society gave scope for a long period of
violent struggles, in which all the antagonisms which first germinated
and ripened in the heat of the revolution raged unhindered and
unrestrained in a spirit of reckless radicalism. A century later the
revolution of the German bourgeoisie, which broke out midway in the
development of capitalism, was already hampered on both sides by the
antagonism of interests and the equilibrium of strength between capital
and labour, and was smothered in a bourgeois-feudal compromise, and
shortened to a miserable episode ending in words.

Another half century, and the present Russian Revolution stands at a
point of the historical path which is already over the summit, which is
on the other side of the culminating point of capitalist society, at
which the bourgeois revolutions cannot again be smothered by the
antagonism between bourgeoisie and proletariat, but, will, on the
contrary, expand into a new lengthy period of violent social struggles,
at which the balancing of the account with absolutism appears a trifle
in comparison with the many new accounts which the revolution itself
opens up. The present revolution realises in the particular affairs of
absolutist Russia the general results of international capitalist
development, and appears not so much as the last successor of the old
bourgeois revolutions as the forerunner of the new series of proletarian
revolutions of the West. The most backward country of all, just because
it has been so unpardonably late with its bourgeois revolution, shows
ways and methods of further class struggle to the proletariat of Germany
and the most advanced capitalist countries.

Accordingly it appears, when looked at in this way, to be entirely wrong
to regard the Russian Revolution as a grandiose spectacle, as something
specifically “Russian,” and at best to admire the heroism of the
fighting men, that is, as outside onlookers of the struggle. It is much
more important that the German workers should learn to look upon the
Russian Revolution _as their own affair_, not merely as a matter of
international solidarity with the Russian proletariat, but first and
foremost, as a _chapter of their own social and political history_.
Those trade-union leaders and parliamentarians who regard the German
proletariat as “too weak” and German conditions “as not ripe enough” for
revolutionary mass struggles, have obviously not the least idea that the
measure of the degree of ripeness of class relations in Germany and of
the power of the proletariat does not lie in the statistics of German
trade unionism or in election figures, but – in the events of the
Russian Revolution. Exactly as the ripeness of French class antagonisms
under the July monarchy and the June battle of Paris was reflected in
the German March Revolution, in its course and its fiasco, so today the
ripeness of German class antagonisms is reflected in the events and in
the power of the Russian Revolution. And while the bureaucrats of the
German labour movement rummage in their office drawers for information
as to their strength and maturity, they do not see that that for which
they seek is lying before their eyes in a great historical revolution,
because, historically considered, the Russian Revolution is a reflex of
the power and the maturity of the international, and therefore in the
first place, of the German labour movement.

It would therefore be a too pitiable and grotesquely insignificant
result of the Russian Revolution if the German proletariat should merely
draw from it the lesson – as is desired by Comrades Frohme, Elm, and
others – of using the extreme form of the struggle, the mass strike, and
so weaken themselves as to be merely a reserve force in the event of the
withdrawal of the parliamentary vote, and therefore a passive means of
parliamentary defensive. When the parliamentary vote is taken from us
there we will resist. That is a self-evident decision. But for this it
is not necessary to adopt the heroic pose of a Danton as was done, for
example, by Comrade Elm in Jena; because the defence of the modest
measure of parliamentary right already possessed is less a
Heaven-storming innovation, for which the frightful hecatombs of the
Russian Revolution were first necessary as a means of encouragement,
than the simplest and first duty of every opposition party. But the mere
defensive can never exhaust the policy of the proletariat, in a period
of revolution. And if it is, on the one hand, difficult to predict with
any degree of certainty whether the destruction of universal suffrage
would cause a situation in Germany which would call forth an immediate
mass strike action, so on the other hand, it is absolutely certain that
when we in Germany enter upon the period of stormy mass actions, it will
be impossible for the social democrats to base their tactics upon a mere
parliamentary defensive.

To fix beforehand the cause and the moment from and in which the mass
strikes in Germany will break out is not in the power of social
democracy, because it is not in its power to bring about historical
situations by resolutions at party congresses. But what it can and must
do is to make clear the political tendencies, when they once appear, and
to formulate them as resolute and consistent tactics. Man cannot keep
historical events in check while making recipes for them, but he can see
in advance their apparent calculable consequences and arrange his mode
of action accordingly.

The first threatening political danger with which the German proletariat
have concerned themselves for a number of years is a coup d’état of the
reaction which will wrest from the wide masses of the people of the most
important political right – universal suffrage. In spite of the immense
importance of this possible event, it is, as we have already said,
impossible to assert with certainty that an open popular movement would
immediately break out after the coup d’état, because today innumerable
circumstances and factors have to be taken into account. But when we
consider the present extreme acuteness of conditions in Germany, and on
the other hand, the manifold international reactions of the Russian
Revolution and of the future rejuvenated Russia, it is clear that the
collapse of German politics which would ensue from the repeal of
universal suffrage could not alone call a halt to the struggle for this
right. This coup d’état would rather draw after it, in a longer or
shorter period and with elementary power, a great general political
reckoning of the insurgent and awakened mass of the people – a reckoning
with bread usury, with artificially caused dearness of meat, with
expenditure on a boundless militarism and “navalism,” with the
corruption of colonial policy, with the national disgrace of the
Konigsberg trial, with the cessation of social reform, with the
discharging of railway workers, the postal officials and the land
workers, with the tricking and mocking of the miners, with the judgement
of Lobtau and the whole system of class justice, with the brutal lockout
system – in short, with the whole thirty-year-old oppression of the
combined dominion of Junkerdom and large trustified capital.

But if once the ball is set rolling then social democracy, whether it
wills it or not, can never again bring it to a standstill. The opponents
of the mass strike are in the habit of denying that the lessons and
examples of the Russian Revolution can be a criterion for Germany
because, in the first place, in Russia the great step must first be
taken from an Oriental despotism to a modern bourgeois legal order. The
formal distance between the old and the new political order is said to
be a sufficient explanation of the vehemence and the violence of the
revolution in Russia. In Germany we have long had the most necessary
forms and guarantees of a constitutional state, from which it follows
that such an elementary raging of social antagonisms is impossible here.

Those who speculate thus forget that in Germany when it once comes to
the outbreak of open political struggles, even the historically
determined goal will be quite different from that in Russia today.
Precisely because the bourgeois legal order in Germany has existed for a
long time, because therefore it has had time to completely exhaust
itself and to draw to an end, because bourgeois democracy and liberalism
have had time to die out – because of this there can no longer be any
talk of a _bourgeois_ revolution in Germany. And therefore in a period
of open political popular struggles in Germany, the last historically
necessary goal can only be the _dictatorship of the proletariat_. The
distance, however, of this task from the present conditions of Germany
is still greater than that of the bourgeois legal order from Oriental
despotism, and therefore, the task cannot be completed at one stroke,
but must similarly be accomplished during a long period of gigantic
social struggles.

But is there not a gross contradiction in the picture we have drawn? On
the one hand it means that in an eventual future period of political
mass action the most backward layers of the German proletariat – the
land workers, the railwaymen, and the postal slaves – will first of all
win the right of combination, and that the worst excrescences of
exploitation must first be removed and on the other hand, the political
task of this period is said to be the conquest of power by the
proletariat! On the one hand, economic, trade-union struggles for the
most immediate interests, for the material elevation of the working
class; on the other hand the ultimate goal of social democracy!
Certainly these are great contradictions, but they are not
contradictions due to our reasoning, but contradictions due to
capitalist development. It does not proceed in a beautiful straight line
but in a lightning-like zig-zag. Just as the various capitalist
countries represent the most varied stages of development, so within
each country the different layers of the same working class are
represented. But history does not wait patiently till the backward
countries, and the most advanced layers have joined together so that the
whole mass can move symmetrically forward like a compact column. It
brings the best prepared parts to explosion as soon as conditions there
are ripe for it, and then in the storm of the revolutionary period, lost
ground is recovered, unequal things are equalised, and the whole pace of
social progress changed at one stroke to the double-quick.

Just as in the Russian Revolution all the grades of development and all
the interests of the different layers of workers are united in the
social democratic programme of the revolution, and the innumerable
partial struggles united in the great common class action of the
proletariat, so will it also be in Germany when the conditions are ripe
for it. And the task of social democracy will then be to regulate its
tactics, not by the most backward phases of development but by the most
advanced.



VIII. NEED FOR UNITED ACTION OF TRADE UNIONS AND SOCIAL DEMOCRACY


 

The most important desideratum which is to be hoped for from the German
working class in the period of great struggles which will come sooner or
later is, after complete resoluteness and consistency of tactics, the
utmost capacity for action, and therefore the utmost possible unity of
the leading social democratic part of the proletarian masses. Meanwhile
the first weak attempts at the preparation of great mass actions have
discovered a serious drawback in this connection: the total separation
and independence of the two organisations of the labour movement, the
social democracy and the trade unions.

It is clear on a closer consideration of the mass strikes in Russia as
well as of the conditions in Germany itself, that any great mass action,
if it is not confined to a mere one-day demonstration, but is intended
to be a real fighting action, cannot possibly be thought of as a
so-called political mass strike. In such an action in Germany the
trade-unions would be implicated as much as the social democrats. Not
because the trade-union leaders imagine that the social democrats, in
view of their smaller organisation, would have no other resources than
the co-operation of one and a quarter million trade-unionists and
without them would be unable to do anything, but because of a much more
deep-lying motive: because every direct mass action of the period of
open class struggles would be at the same time both political and
economic. If in Germany, from any cause and at any time, it should come
to great political struggles, to mass strikes, then at that time an era
of violent trade-union struggles would begin in Germany, and events
would not stop to inquire whether the trade-union leaders had given
their consent to the movement or not. Whether they stand aside or
endeavour to resist the movement, the result of their attitude will only
be that the trade-union leaders, like the party leaders in the analogous
case, will simply be swept aside by the rush of events, and the economic
and the political struggles of the masses will be fought out without
them.

As a matter-of-fact the separation of the political, and the economic
struggle and the independence of each, is nothing but an artificial
product of the parliamentarian period, even if historically determined.
On the one hand in the peaceful, “normal” course of bourgeois society,
the economic struggle is split into a multitude of individual struggles
in every undertaking and dissolved in every branch of production. On the
other hand the political struggle is not directed by the masses
themselves in a direct action, but in correspondence with the form of
the bourgeois state, in a representative fashion, by the presence of
legislative representation. As soon as a period of revolutionary
struggle commences, that is, as soon as the masses appear on the scene
of conflict, the breaking up the economic struggle into many parts, as
well as the indirect parliamentary form of the political struggle
ceases; in a revolutionary mass action the political struggle ceases; in
a revolutionary mass action the political and economic struggle are one,
and the artificial boundary between trade union and social democracy as
two separate, wholly independent forms of the labour movement, is simply
swept away. But what finds concrete expression in the revolutionary mass
movement finds expression also in the parliamentary period as an actual
state of affairs. There are not two different class struggles of the
working class, an economic and a political one, but only _one_ class
struggle, which aims at one and the same time at the limitation of
capitalist exploitation within bourgeois society, and at the abolition
of exploitation together with bourgeois society itself.

When these two sides of the class struggle are separated from one
another for technical reasons in the parliamentary period, they do not
form two parallel concurrent actions, but merely two phases, two stages
of the struggle for emancipation of the working class. The trade-union
struggle embraces the immediate interests, and the social democratic
struggle the future interests, of the labour movement. The communists,
says the COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, represent, as against various group
interests, national or local, of the proletariat, the common interests
of the proletariat as a whole, and in the various stages of development
of the class struggle, they represent the interests of the whole
movement, that is, the ultimate goal – the liberation of the
proletariat. The trade unions represent only the group interests and
only one stage of development of the labour movement. Social democracy
represents the working class and the cause of its liberation as a whole.
The relation of the trade unions to social democracy is therefore a part
of the whole, and when, amongst the trade-union leaders, the theory of
“equal authority” of trade-unions and social democracy finds so much
favour, it rests upon a fundamental misconception of the essence of
trade-unionism itself and of its role in the general struggle for
freedom of the working class.

This theory of the parallel action of social democracy and the
trade-unions and of their “equal authority” is nevertheless not
altogether without foundation, but has its historical roots. It rests
upon the illusion of the peaceful, “normal” period of bourgeois society,
in which the political struggle of social democracy appears to be
consumed in the parliamentary struggle. The parliamentary struggle,
however, the counterpart of the trade-union struggle, is equally with
it, a fight conducted exclusively on the basis of the bourgeois social
order. It is by its very nature, political reform work, as that of the
trade-unions is economic reform work. It represents political work for
the present, as trade-unions represent economic work for the present. It
is, like them, merely a phase, a stage of development in the complete
process of the proletarian class struggle whose ultimate goal is as far
beyond the parliamentary struggle as it is beyond the trade-union
struggle. The parliamentary struggle is, in relation to social
democratic policy, also a part of the whole, exactly as trade-union work
is. Social democracy today comprises the parliamentary and the
trade-union struggle in one class struggle aiming at the abolition of
the bourgeois social order.

The theory of the “equal authority” of trade-unions and social democracy
is likewise not a mere theoretical misunderstanding, not a mere case of
confusion but an expression of the well-known tendency of that
opportunist wing of social democracy which reduced the political
struggle of the working class to the parliamentary contest, and desires
to change social democracy from a revolutionary proletarian party into a
petty-bourgeois reform one.^([1]) If social democracy should accept the
theory of the “equal authority” of the trade-unions, it would thereby
accept, indirectly and tacitly, that transformation which has long been
striven for by the representatives of the opportunist tendency.

In Germany, however, there is such a shifting of relations within the
labour movement as is impossible in any other country. The theoretical
conception, according to which the trade-unions are merely a part of
social democracy, finds its classic expression in Germany in fact, in
actual practice, and that in three directions. First, the German
trade-unions are a direct product of social democracy; it was social
democracy which created the beginnings of the present trade-union
movement in Germany and which enabled it to attain such great
dimensions, and it is social democracy which supplies it to this day
with its leaders and the most active promoters of its organisation.

Second, the German trade-unions are a product of social democracy also
in the sense that social democratic teaching is the soul of trade-union
practice, as the trade-unions owe their superiority over all bourgeois
and denominational trade-unions to the idea of the class struggle; their
practical success, their power, is a result of the circumstance that
their practice is illuminated by the theory of scientific socialism and
they are thereby raised above the level of a narrow-minded socialism.
The strength of the “practical policy” of the German trade-unions lies
in their insight into the deeper social and economic connections of the
capitalist system; but they owe this insight entirely to the theory of
scientific socialism upon which their practice is based. Viewed in this
way, any attempt to emancipate the trade-unions from the social
democratic theory in favour of some other “trade-union theory” opposed
to social democracy, is, from the standpoint of the trade-unions
themselves and of their future, nothing but an attempt to commit
suicide. The separation of trade-union practice from the theory of
scientific socialism would mean to the German trade-unions the immediate
loss of all their superiority over all kinds of bourgeois trade-unions,
and their fall from their present height to the level of unsteady
groping and mere dull empiricism.

Thirdly and finally, the trade-unions are, although their leaders have
gradually lost sight of the fact, even as regards their numerical
strength, a direct product of the social democratic movement and the
social democratic agitation. It is true that in many districts
trade-union agitation precedes social democratic agitation, and that
everywhere trade-union work prepares the way for party work. From the
point of view of effect, party and trade-unions assist each other to the
fullest extent. But when the picture of the class struggle in Germany is
looked at as a whole and its more deep-seated associations, the
proportions are considerably altered. Many trade-union leaders are in
the habit of looking down triumphantly from the proud height of their
membership of one and a quarter million on the miserable organised
members of the Social Democratic Party, not yet half a million strong,
and of recalling the time, ten or twelve years ago, when those in the
ranks of social democracy were pessimistic as to the prospects of
trade-union development.

They do see that between these two things – the large number of
organised trade unionists and the small number of organised Social
Democrats – _there exists in a certain degree a direct causal
connection._ Thousands and thousands of workers do not join the party
organisations precisely because they join the trade-unions. According to
the theory, all the workers must be doubly organised, must attend two
kinds of meetings, pay double contributions, read two kinds of workers’
papers, etc. But for this it is necessary to have a higher standard of
intelligence and of that idealism which, from a pure feeling of duty to
the labour movement, is prepared for the daily sacrifice of time and
money, and finally, a higher standard of that passionate interest in the
actual life of the party which can only be engendered by membership of
the party organisation. All this is true of the most enlightened and
intelligent minority of social democratic workers in the large towns,
where party life is full and attractive and where the workers’ standard
of living is high. Amongst the wider sections of the working masses in
the large towns, however, as well as in the provinces, in the smaller
and the smallest towns where political life is not an independent thing
but a mere reflex of the course of events in the capital, where
consequently, party life is poor and monotonous, and where, finally, the
economic standard of life of the workers is, for the most part,
miserable, it is very difficult to secure the double form of
organisation.

For the social democratically-minded worker from the masses the question
will be solved by his joining his trade-union. The immediate interests
of his economic struggle which are conditioned by the nature of the
struggle itself cannot be advanced in any other way than by membership
of a trade-union organisation. The contribution which he pays, often
amidst considerable sacrifice of his standard of living, bring him
immediate, visible results. His social democratic inclinations, however,
enable him to participate in various kinds of work without belonging to
a special party organisation; by voting at parliamentary elections, by
attendance at social democratic public meetings, by following the
reports of social democratic speeches in representatives bodies, and by
reading the party press. Compare in this connection the number of social
democratic electors or the number of subscribers to VORWÄRTS with the
number of organised party members in Berlin!

And what is most decisive, the social democratically-minded average
worker who, as a simple man, can have no understanding of the intricate
and fine so-called two-soul theory, feels that he is, even in the trade
union, _social democratically_ organised. Although the central
committees of the unions have no official party label, the workman from
the masses in every city and town sees the head of his trade-union as
the most active leader, those colleagues whom he knows also as comrades
and social democrats in public life, now as Reichstag, Landstag or local
representatives, now as trusted men of the social democracy, members of
election committees, party editors and secretaries, or merely as
speakers and agitators. Further, he hears expressed in the agitational
work of his trade-union much the same ideas, pleasing and intelligible
to him, of capitalist exploitation, class relations, etc., as those that
have come to him from social democratic agitation. Indeed, the most and
best loved of the speakers at trade-union meetings are those same social
democrats.

Thus everything combines to give the average class-conscious worker the
feeling that he, in being organised in his trade-union, is also a member
of his labour party and is social democratically organised, _and therein
lies the peculiar recruiting strength of the German trade-unions._ Not
because of the appearance of neutrality, but because of the social
democratic reality of their being, have the central unions being enabled
to attain their present strength. This is simply through the
co-existence of the various unions – Catholic, Hirsch-Dunker, etc. –
founded by bourgeois parties by which it was sought to establish the
necessity for that political “neutrality.” When the German worker who
has full freedom of choice to attach himself to a Christian, Catholic,
Evangelical or Free-thinking trade-union, chooses none of these but the
“free trade-union” instead, or leaves one of the former to join the
latter, he does so only because he considers that the central unions are
the avowed organisations of the modern class struggle, or, what is the
same thing in Germany, that they are social democratic trade-unions.

In a word the appearance of “neutrality,” which exists in the minds of
many trade-union leaders, does not exist for the mass of organised
trade-unionists. And that is the good fortune of the trade-union
movement. If the appearance of “neutrality”, that alienation and
separation of the trade-unions from social democracy, really and truly
becomes a reality in the eyes of the proletarian masses, then the
trade-unions would immediately lose all their advantages over competing
bourgeois unions, and therewith their recruiting power, their living
fire. This is conclusively proved by the facts which are generally
known. The appearance of party-political “neutrality” of the
trade-unions could, as a means of attraction, render inestimable service
in a country in which social democracy itself has no credit among the
masses, in which the odium attaching a workers’ organisation injures it
in the eyes of the masses rather than advantages it – where, in a word,
the trade-unions must first of all recruit their troops from a wholly
unenlightened, bourgeois-minded mass.

The best example of such a country was, throughout the whole of the last
century, and is to a certain extent today, Great Britain. In Germany,
however, party relations are altogether different. In a country, in
which social democracy is the most powerful political party, in which
its recruiting power is represented by an army of over three million
proletarians, it is ridiculous to speak of the deterrent effect of
social democracy and of the necessity for a fighting organisation of the
workers to ensure political neutrality. The mere comparison of the
figures of social democratic voters with the figures of the trade-union
organisations in Germany is sufficient to prove to the most
simple-minded that the trade-unions in Germany do not, as in England,
draw their troops from the unenlightened bourgeois-minded mass, but from
the mass of proletarians already aroused by the social democracy and won
by it to the idea of the class struggle. Many trade-union leaders
indignantly reject the idea – a requisite of the “theory of neutrality”
– and regard the trade-unions as a recruiting school for social
democracy. This apparently insulting, but in reality, highly flattering
presumption is in Germany reduced to mere fancy by the circumstance that
the positions are reversed; it is the social democracy which is the
recruiting school for the trade-unions.

Moreover, if the organisational work of the trade-unions is for the most
part of a very difficult and troublesome kind, it is, with the exception
of a few cases and some districts, not merely because on the whole, the
soil has not been prepared by the social democratic plough, but also
because the trade-union seed itself, and the sower as well, must also be
“red,” social democratic before the harvest can prosper. But when we
compare in this way the figures of trade-union strength, not with those
of the social democratic organisations, but – which is the only correct
way – with those of the mass of social democratic voters, we come to a
conclusion which differs considerably from the current view of the
matter. The fact then comes to light that the “free trade-unions”
actually represent today but a minority of the class-conscious workers
of Germany, that even with their one and a quarter million organised
members they have not yet been able to draw into their ranks one-half of
those already aroused by social democracy.

The most important conclusion to be drawn from the facts above cited is
that the _complete unity_ of the trade-union and the social democratic
movements, which is absolutely necessary for the coming mass struggles
in Germany, _is actually here_, and that it is incorporated in the wide
mass which forms the basis at once of social democracy and
trade-unionism, and in whose consciousness both parts of the movement
are mingled in a mental unity. The alleged antagonism between Social
Democracy and trade unions shrinks to an antagonism between Social
Democracy and a certain part of the trade-union officials, which is,
however, at the same time an antagonism within the trade unions between
this part of the trade-union leaders and the proletarian mass organized
in trade unions.

The rapid growth of the trade-union movement in Germany in the course of
the last fifteen years, especially in the period of great economic
prosperity from 1895 to 1900 has brought with it a great independence of
the trade-unions, a specialising of their methods of struggle, and
finally the introduction of a regular trade-union officialdom. All these
phenomena are quite understandable and natural historical products of
the growth of the trade-unions in this fifteen-year period, and of the
economic prosperity and political calm of Germany. They are, although
inseparable from certain drawbacks, without doubt a historically
necessary evil. But the dialectics of development also brings with it
the circumstance that these necessary means of promoting trade-union
growth become, on the contrary, obstacles to this further development at
a certain stage of organisation and at a certain degree of ripeness of
conditions.

The specialisation of professional activity as trade-union leaders, as
well as the naturally restricted horizon which is bound up with
disconnected economic struggles in a peaceful period, leads only too
easily, amongst trade-union officials, to bureaucratism and a certain
narrowness of outlook. Both, however, express themselves in a whole
series of tendencies which may be fateful in the highest degree for the
future of the trade-union movement. There is first of all the
overvaluation of the organisation, which from a means has gradually been
changed into an end in itself, a precious thing, to which the interests
of the struggles should be subordinated. From this also comes that
openly admitted need for peace which shrinks from great risks and
presumed dangers to the stability of the trade-unions, and further, the
overvaluation of the trade-union method of struggle itself, its
prospects and its successes.

The trade-union leaders, constantly absorbed in the economic guerrilla
war whose plausible task it is to make the workers place the highest
value on the smallest economic achievement, every increase in wages and
shortening of the working day, gradually lose the power of seeing the
larger connections and of taking a survey of the whole position. Only in
this way can one explain why many trade-union leaders refer with the
greatest satisfaction to the achievements of the last fifteen years,
instead of, on the contrary, emphasising the other side of the medal;
the simultaneous and immense reduction of the proletarian standard of
life by land usury, by the whole tax and customs policy, by landlord
rapacity which has increased house rents to such an exorbitant extent,
in short, by all the objective tendencies of bourgeois policy which have
largely neutralised the advantages of the fifteen years of trade-union
struggle. From the _whole_ social democratic truth which, while
emphasising the importance of the present work and its absolute
necessity, attaches the chief importance to the criticism and the limits
to this work, the _half_ trade-union truth is taken which emphasises
only the positive side of the daily struggle.

And finally, from the concealment of the objective limits drawn by the
bourgeois social order to the trade-union struggle, there arises a
hostility to every theoretical criticism which refers to these limits in
connection with the ultimate aims of the labour movement. Fulsome
flattery and boundless optimism are considered to be the duty of every
“friend of the trade-union movement.” But as the social democratic
standpoint consists precisely in fighting against uncritical
parliamentary optimism, a front is at last made against the social
democratic theory: men grope for a “new trade-union theory,” that is, a
theory which would open an illimitable vista of economic progress to the
trade-union struggle within the capitalist system, in opposition to the
social democratic doctrine. Such a theory has indeed existed for some
time – the theory of Professor Sombart which was promulgated with the
express intention of driving a wedge between the trade-unions and the
social democracy in Germany, and of enticing the trade-unions over to
the bourgeois position.

In close connection with these theoretical tendencies is a revolution in
the relations of leaders and rank-and-file. In place of the direction by
colleagues through local committees, with their admitted inadequacy,
there appears the business-like direction of the trade-union officials.
The initiative and the power of making decisions thereby devolve upon
trade-union specialists, so to speak, and the more passive virtue of
discipline upon the mass of members. This dark side of officialdom also
assuredly conceals considerable dangers for the party, as from the
latest innovation, the institution of local party secretaries, it can
quite easily result, if the social democratic mass is not careful that
these secretariats may remain mere organs for carrying out decisions and
not be regarded in any way the appointed bearers of the initiative and
of the direction of local party life. But by the nature of the case, by
the character of the political struggle, there are narrow bounds drawn
to bureaucratism in social democracy as in trade-union life.

But here the technical specialising of wage struggles as, for example,
the conclusion of intricate tariff agreements and for the like,
frequently means that the mass of organised workers are prohibited from
taking a “survey of the whole industrial life,” and their incapacity for
taking decisions is thereby established. A consequence of this
conception is the argument with which every theoretical criticism of the
prospects and possibilities of trade-union practice is tabooed and which
alleges that it represents a danger to the pious trade-union sentiment
of the masses. From this, a point of view has been developed, that it is
only by blind, child-like faith in the efficacy of the trade-union
struggle that the working masses can be won and held for the
organisation. In contradistinction to social democracy which bases its
influence on the unity of the masses amidst the contradictions of the
existing order and in the complicated character of its development, and
on the critical attitude of the masses to all factors and stages of
their own class struggle, the influence and the power of the
trade-unions are founded upon the upside-down theory of the incapacity
of the masses for criticism and decision. “The faith of the people must
be maintained” – that is the fundamental principle, acting upon which
many trade-union officials stamp as attempts on the life of this
movement, all criticisms of the objective inadequacy of trade-unionism.

And finally, a result of all this specialisation and this bureaucratism
amongst trade-union officials is the great independence and the
“neutrality” of the trade-unions in relation to social democracy. The
extreme independence of the trade-union organisation is a natural result
of its growth, as a relation which has grown out of the technical
division of work between the political and the trade-union forms of
struggle. The “neutrality” of the German trade-unions, on its part,
arose as a product of the reactionary trade-union legislation of the
Prusso-German police state. With time, both aspects of their nature have
altered. From the condition of political “neutrality” of the
trade-unions imposed by the police, a theory of their voluntary
neutrality has been evolved as a necessity founded upon the alleged
nature of the trade-union struggle itself. And the technical
independence of the trade-unions which should rest upon the division of
work in the unified social democratic class struggle, the separation of
the trade-unions from social democracy, from its views and its
leadership, has been changed into the so-called equal authority of
trade-unions and social democracy.

The appearance of separation and equality of trade-unions and social
democracy is, however, incorporated chiefly in the trade-union
_officials_, and strengthened through the managing apparatus of the
trade-unions. Outwardly, by the co-existence of a complete staff of
trade-union officials, of a wholly independent central committee, of
numerous professional press, and finally of a trade-union congress, the
illusion is created of an exact parallel with the managing apparatus of
the social democracy, the party executive, the party press and the party
conference. This illusion of equality between social democracy and the
trade-union had led to, amongst other things, the monstrous spectacle
that, in part, quite analogous agendas are discussed at social
democratic conferences and trade-union congresses, and that on the same
questions different, and even diametrically opposite, decisions are
taken. From the natural division of work between the party conference
(which represents the general interests and tasks of the labour
movement), and the trade-union congress (which deals with the much
narrower sphere of social questions and interests) the artificial
division has been made of a pretended trade-union and a social
democratic outlook in relation to _the same_ general questions and
interests of the labour movement.

Thus the peculiar position has arisen that this same trade-union
movement which below, in the wide proletarian masses, is absolutely one
with social democracy, parts abruptly from it above, in the
super-structure of management, and sets itself up as an independent
great power. The German labour movement therefore assumes the peculiar
form of a double pyramid whose base and body consist of one solid mass
but whose apexes are wide apart.

It is clear from this presentation of the case in what way alone in a
natural and successful manner that compact unity of the German labour
movement can be attained which, in view of the coming political class
struggles and of the peculiar interests of the further development of
the trade-unions, is indispensably necessary. Nothing could be more
perverse or more hopeless than to desire to attain the unity desired by
means of sporadic and periodical negotiations on individual questions
affecting the labour movement between the Social Democratic Party
leadership and the trade-union central committees. It is just the
highest circles of both forms of the labour movement, which as we have
seen, incorporate their separation and self-sufficiency, which are
themselves, therefore, the promoters of the illusion of the “equal
authority” and of the parallel existence of social democracy and
trade-unionism.

To desire the unity of these through the union of the party executive
and the general commission is to desire to build a bridge at the very
spot where the distance is greater and the crossing more difficult. Not
above, amongst the heads of the leading directing organisations and in
their federative alliance, but below, amongst the organised proletarian
masses, lies the guarantee of the real unity of the labour movement. In
the consciousness of the million trade-unionists, the party and the
trade unions are actually _one_, they represent in different forms the
_social democratic_ struggle for the emancipation of the proletariat.
And the necessity automatically arises therefrom of removing any causes
of friction which have arisen between the social democracy and a part of
the trade unions, of adapting their mutual relation to the consciousness
of the proletarian masses, that is, _of re-joining the trade-unions to
social democracy_. The synthesis of the real development which led from
the original incorporation of the trade-unions to their separation from
social democracy will thereby be expressed, and the way will be prepared
for the coming period of great proletarian mass struggles during the
period of vigorous growth, of both trade-unions and social democracy and
their reunion, in the interests of both, will become a necessity.

It is not, of course, a question of the merging of the trade-union
organisation in the party, but of the restoration of the unity of social
democracy and the trade-unions which corresponds to the actual relation
between the labour movement as a whole and its partial trade-union
expression. Such a revolution will inevitably call forth a vigorous
opposition from a part of the trade-union leadership. But it is high
time for the working masses of social democracy to learn how to express
their capacity for decision and action, and therewith to demonstrate
their ripeness for that time of great struggles and great tasks in which
they, the masses, will be the actual chorus and the directing bodies
will merely act the “speaking parts,” that is, will only be the
interpreters of the will of the masses.

The trade-union movement is not that which is reflected in the quite
understandable _but irrational_ illusion of a minority of the
trade-union leaders, but that which lives in the consciousness of the
mass of proletarians who have been won for the class struggle. In this
consciousness the trade-union movement is part of social democracy. “And
what it is, that should it dare to appear.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Footnote

^([1]) As the existence of such a tendency within German social
democracy is generally denied, one must be grateful for the candour with
which the opportunist trend has recently formulated its real aims and
wishes. At a party meeting in Mayence on September 10, 1909, the
following resolution, proposed by Dr. David, was carried.

“Whereas the Social Democratic Party interprets the term ‘revolution’
not in the sense of violent overthrow, but in the peaceful sense of
development, that is, the gradual realisation of a new economic
principle, the public party meeting at Mayence repudiates every kind of
revolutionary romance.”

“The meeting sees in the conquest of political power nothing but the
winning over of the majority of the people to the ideas and demands of
the social democracy; a conquest which cannot be achieved by means of
violence, but only by the revolutionising of the mind by means of
intellectual propaganda and practical reform work in all spheres of
political, economic and social life.”

“In the conviction that social democracy flourishes far better when it
employs legal means that when it relies on illegal means and revolution,
the meeting repudiates ‘_direct mass action_’ as a tactical principle,
and holds fast to the principle of ‘parliamentary reform action,’ that
is, it desires that the party in the future as in the past, shall
earnestly endeavour to _achieve its aims by legislation and gradual
organisational development._”

“The indispensable condition for this reformist method of struggle is
that _the possibility of participation of the dispossessed masses of the
people in the legislation_ of the empire and of the individual states
shall not be lessened but _increased to the fullest possible extent_.
For this reason, the meeting declares it to be an incontestable right of
the working class to withhold its labour for a longer or shorter period
to ward off attacks on its legal rights and to gain further rights, when
all other means fail.”

“But as the political mass strike can only be victoriously carried
through when kept within _strictly legal limits_ and when the strikers
give no reasonable excuse to the authorities to resort to armed force,
the meeting perceives the only necessary and real preparation for the
exercise of this method of struggle in the further extension of the
political, trade-union and co-operative organisations. Because only in
this way can the conditions be created amongst the wide masses of the
people which can guarantee the successful prosecution of a mass strike:
conscious discipline and adequate economic support.”
